Mississippi, session 2026, HB1122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 1-1-59, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 1-1-59.  The Joint Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation may contract with a reputable and competent company to perform any services necessary to update any computer tape, disc or other technological medium furnished with the Mississippi Code of 1972, and to provide for and update a CD-ROM (compact disc, read-only memory) or other disc or technological medium containing the Mississippi Code of 1972 and its annotations, so that all laws of a general nature passed by the Legislature subsequent to the 1971 session thereof will be incorporated therein in the same format as the pocket part supplements and supplemental material contained in replacement volumes to the Code of 1972. This contract may be made with the same publishing company contracted with under Section 1-1-107(a) and may be included as a provision of that contract with the publishing company instead of being a separate contract. If the same cannot be contracted for, at and for a consideration considered reasonable, the joint committee may request the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services to perform such services and pay over to the department such sums as may be appropriated for such purposes, and the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services may expend such sums as paid over for the employment of personnel and the purchase of such services, supplies, materials and equipment as may be required to perform the work. SECTION 2.  Section 7-1-403, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 7-1-403.  The Bond Advisory Division is hereby granted the authority and charged with the responsibility to perform the following duties: (a)  To maintain a close working relationship with agencies authorized to incur bonded indebtedness in order to know the probable schedule for the issuance of bonds so that coordination may be accomplished for orderly issuance. (b)  To require all state agencies authorized to incur bonded indebtedness, in addition to cooperation required in subsection (a), to submit written notice of intent to sell bonds at least thirty (30) days prior to requesting the State Bond Commission to approve the sale of such bonds.  Such notification shall contain such information as may be required by the director.  However, with the concurrence of the State Fiscal Officer, in cases of emergency the requirement of thirty (30) days' notice may be waived by the director. (c)  To require all state agencies or political subdivisions to submit annual financial reports, and such other interim reports as deemed necessary, on projects financed by state revenue bonds or by state bonds which have the general obligation pledge of the state, but which are primarily backed by specified revenues. (d)  To maintain a complete record of all outstanding state bonds.  The record shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following: (i)  Amount of principal of the bonds issued and the rates of interest; (ii)  Dates the bonds were issued, the term or terms of the bonds, and maturities; (iii)  The overall average interest rate to be paid on each issue; (iv)  The name of the paying agent; (v)  The trustees named to administer the issue and the pledges securing such bonds; (vi)  The statutes under which such bonds were issued and the statutory authority for all bonds authorized, whether issued or unissued. (e)  To maintain a close working relationship with the Mississippi Development Authority, the University Research Center and the Commissioner of Revenue in order to obtain current information concerning the economic, financial and growth conditions of the state and such other information necessary to properly comply with the intent of Sections 7-1-401 and 7-1-403. (f)  To receive the cooperation of all state agencies and institutions in accumulating the information required by Sections 7-1-401 and 7-1-403. (g)  To make continuing studies and investigations of government bond interest costs throughout the United States of America and to advise the Governor, the State Bond Commission and the Legislature concerning market conditions and credit condition of the state. (h)  To contract with the Department of Information Technology Services for such data processing or computer services as are necessary in providing complete, current and accurate information regarding bonds issued, maturity dates, interest costs, bond market trends and other data necessary for the proper management of the state's debt and investments of state funds. (i)  To issue rules and regulations as are necessary for the enforcement of the provisions of Sections 7-1-401 and 7-1-403. (j)  To investigate and require reports covering proposed transactions involving refunding bond issues, bond exchanges, bond trades, bond "swaps," redemptions, etc., which may be engaged in with regard to any state bond. (k)  To keep the Governor, Bond Commission and the Legislature informed regarding the credit outlook for the state and to furnish whatever information the Legislature requests which is required to be maintained under Sections 7-1-401 and 7-1-403. (l)  To maintain a personal relationship with rating agencies and state bond investors, including the responsibility to invite people in the national financial community to visit our state in order for them to better understand our undertakings, and to incur and pay all expenses in connection with the administration and function of the division, including information meetings or other appropriate forms of communication.  All such expenses for these trips shall be paid from appropriations made for the operation of this division. (m)  To cooperate with and provide assistance to counties, municipalities and other political subdivisions when the respective governing authorities request such assistance regarding matters of financial and credit administration and in the preparation of materials and information required to be used in connection with credit ratings and the sale of bonds. (n)  To perform such other duties and acts necessary to carry out the intent of Sections 7-1-401 and 7-1-403. (o)  To maintain a complete record of the name and business address of any person, firm, corporation or other entity deriving any income for services performed with respect to any bonds issued after May 16, 1988, by the State Bond Commission, State Development Bank, Mississippi Housing Finance Corporation, Certified Development Company of Mississippi, Inc., Mississippi Hospital Equipment and Facilities Authority or any other entity issuing bonds or notes of the State of Mississippi.  The report shall specify the amount of funds, whether from bond proceeds or otherwise, paid or to be paid to each such person or entity for services performed for each such bond issue.  The initial report shall be made available on or before January 15, 1989, to the Clerk of the House of Representatives and to the Secretary of the Senate.  All subsequent updated reports shall be submitted on or before January 15 of each year to the Clerk of the House of Representatives, the Secretary of the Senate, the Chairman of the House Ways and Means Committee and the Chairman of the Senate Finance Committee.  The State Bond Attorney shall annually compile a list of all local bond issues, itemizing the name of the issuer, a description of the issue, the amount of the bonds issued and the name and address of the person acting as bond counsel on the issue.  Such list shall be submitted on or before January 15 of each year to the Clerk of the House of Representatives, the Secretary of the Senate, the Chairman of the House Ways and Means Committee, the Chairman of the Senate Finance Committee, and the Joint Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review Committee (PEER).  The reports required to be compiled pursuant to this paragraph shall be posted on the Department of Finance and Administration's website by not later than January 15 of each year. SECTION 3.  Section 7-7-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 7-7-3.  (1)  There is hereby established a General Accounting Office for the State of Mississippi, the powers and duties of said office to be performed by the Bureau of Budget and Fiscal Management under the administration of the State Fiscal Officer. (2)  The Chief of the Fiscal Management Division, under the supervision of the State Fiscal Officer, shall prescribe and implement in the office of each state agency an adequate accrual accounting system, in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles, and a system for keeping other essential financial records or, in lieu thereof, may install a state centralized automated accounting system which facilitates reporting the financial position and operations of the state as a whole, in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles.  All such accounting systems so prescribed or installed shall be as uniform as may be practicable for agencies and offices of the same class and character. Each state agency shall adopt and use the system prescribed and approved for it by the State Fiscal Officer, and the State Fiscal Officer shall have the authority and power to impound all funds of such agency until it complies with the provisions of this section.  Said state centralized automated accounting system shall be made available to the agencies of state government through the services of the State Computer Center.  The State Fiscal Officer shall conduct training seminars on a regular basis to ensure that agencies have access to persons proficient in the correct use of the statewide automated accounting system. (3)  The State Fiscal Officer shall establish an oversight advisory committee to ensure that the state centralized automated accounting system meets the needs of the agencies served thereby. Said oversight advisory committee shall be composed of qualified public employees proficient in the areas of fiscal management, accounting, data processing and other fields affected by the automated accounting and financial management system.  Said committee shall have the following responsibilities: (a)  Provide continual review of laws, rules, regulations, policies and procedures which affect the continued successful implementation of the state automated accounting and financial management system; (b)  Coordination among the control agencies of state and federal government to identify required modifications and/or enhancements to the state centralized automated accounting system as required for successful implementation; (c)  Ensure that agencies using the system are in compliance with the requirements of the various control agencies; and (d)  Assign persons knowledgeable in their area of expertise and proper use of the state centralized automated accounting system to help agencies use the system correctly. (4)  The State Fiscal Officer shall provide for the continuing support of the state centralized automated accounting system from funds appropriated therefor by the Legislature and/or from user fees charged to the state agencies and institutions utilizing the system. The State Fiscal Officer may charge fees to agencies and institutions for services rendered to them in conjunction with the statewide automated accounting system.  The amounts of such fees shall be set by the State Fiscal Officer, and all such fees collected shall be paid into the Statewide Automated Accounting System Fund. (5)  There is hereby established within the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the Mississippi Management and Reporting System Revolving Fund.  This fund is established for the purpose of developing and maintaining an executive information system within state government.  Such a system may include the state centralized automated accounting system, a centralized automated human resource/payroll system for state agencies and the automation of performance programmatic data and other data as needed by the legislative and executive branches to monitor the receipt and expenditure of funds in accordance with desired objectives. A Steering Committee consisting of the State Fiscal Officer, the Executive Director of the State Personnel Board and the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall establish policies and procedures for the administration of the Mississippi Management and Reporting System Revolving Fund. All disbursements from this fund shall be made pursuant to appropriation by the Legislature.  All interest earned from the investment of monies in this fund shall be credited to such fund. Any expenditure of funds related to the development of a Mississippi Management and Reporting System by the State Personnel Board, the Department of Finance and Administration and the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services made during the fiscal year ending June 30, 1993, shall be reimbursable from the Mississippi Management and Reporting System Revolving Fund upon its establishment. The Bond Commission is hereby authorized to grant a noninterest-bearing loan to the Mississippi Management and Reporting System Revolving Fund from the State Treasurer's General Fund/Special Fund Pool in an amount not to exceed Fifteen Million Dollars ($15,000,000.00). The Mississippi Management and Reporting System Steering Committee shall appoint an administrator of the Mississippi Management and Reporting System Revolving Fund.  The salary of the administrator and all other project administrative expenses shall be disbursed from the revolving fund.  The administrator of the fund is hereby authorized to employ or secure personnel service contracts for all personnel required to carry out this project.  On or before January 15 of each year, the State Fiscal Officer shall present a report of all expenditures made during the previous fiscal year from the Mississippi Management and Reporting System Revolving Fund to the State Bond Commission and to the Legislature. Upon implementation of the Mississippi Management and  Reporting System, or any part thereof, at any state agency, a repayment schedule shall be determined by the Mississippi Management and Reporting System Revolving Fund administrator for payment back into the Mississippi Management and Reporting System Revolving Fund.  This repayment schedule will include direct and indirect expenses of implementing the Mississippi Management and Reporting System at each agency and applied interest charges.  Each state agency shall be required to request the amount of its yearly repayment in its annual budget request. At the completion of the Mississippi Management and Reporting System, the Steering Committee shall recommend to the Legislature an amount to remain in the Mississippi Management and Reporting System Revolving Fund to fund future upgrades and maintenance for the system.  The remaining amount, as repaid by the agencies, shall be returned to the General Fund/Special Fund Pool. Each state agency executive director shall participate in the Mississippi Management and Reporting System (MMRS) project by appointing an agency implementation team leader to represent them on the MMRS project.  All agencies will be required to implement the MMRS unless exempted from such by the MMRS Steering Committee. If such an exemption is granted, the MMRS Steering Committee may require selected data to be electronically interfaced into the MMRS. (6)  In addition to his other duties, the Chief of the Fiscal Management Division shall perform the following services: (a)  Maintain a set of control accounts on a double entry accrual basis for each state fund so as to analyze, classify and record all resources, obligations and financial transactions of all state agencies. (b)  Submit to the Governor and to the Legislative Budget Office a monthly report containing the state's financial operations and conditions. (c)  Approve as to form the manner in which all payrolls shall be prepared; and require each state agency to furnish copies of monthly payrolls as required to the State Fiscal Officer.  The Chief of the Fiscal Management Division shall study the feasibility of a central payroll system for all state officers and employees, and report his findings and recommendations to the Legislature. (d)  Require of each state agency, through its governing board or executive head, the maintaining of continuous internal audit covering the activities of such agency affecting its revenue and expenditures, and an adequate internal system of preauditing claims, demands and accounts against such agency as to adequately ensure that only valid claims, demands and accounts will be paid, and to verify compliance with the regulations of the State Personal Service Contract Review Board regarding the execution of any personal service or professional service contracts pursuant to Section 25-9-120(3).  The Fiscal Management Division shall report to the State Fiscal Officer any failure or refusal of the governing board or executive head of any state agency to comply with the provisions of this section.  The State Fiscal Officer shall notify the said board of trustees or executive head of such violation and, upon continued failure or refusal to comply with the provisions of this section, then the State Fiscal Officer may require said board of trustees or executive head of such state agency to furnish competent and adequate personnel to carry out the provisions of this section, who shall be responsible to the State Fiscal Officer for the performance of such function with respect to such state agency.  For failure or refusal to comply with the provisions of this section or the directions of the State Fiscal Officer, any such employee may be deprived of the power to perform such functions on behalf of the Fiscal Management Division. (7)  Every state agency, through the proper officials or employee, shall make such periodic or special reports on forms prescribed by the Chief of the Fiscal Management Division as may be required or necessary to maintain the set of control accounts required. If any officer or employee of any state agency whose duty it is to do so shall refuse or fail to make such periodic or special reports in such form and in such detail and within such time as the Fiscal Management Division may require in the exercise of this authority, the State Fiscal Officer shall prepare or cause to be prepared and submitted such reports and the expense thereof shall be personally borne by said officer or employee and he or she shall be responsible on his or her official bond for the payment of the expense. Provided that a negligently prepared report shall be considered as a refusal or failure under the  provisions of this section. (8)  From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law. (9)  From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section. SECTION 4.  Section 19-5-307, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 19-5-307.  (1)  When any district is created, the board of supervisors of the county creating such district may appoint a board of commissioners composed of seven (7) members to govern its affairs, and shall fix the domicile of the board at any point within the district.  The members of the board shall be qualified electors of the district, two (2) of whom shall be appointed for terms of two (2) years, three (3) for terms of three (3) years, and two (2) for terms of four (4) years, dating from the date of the adoption of the ordinance creating the district. Thereafter, all appointments of the members shall be for terms of four (4) years. (2)  The board of commissioners shall have complete and sole authority to appoint a chairman and any other officers it may deem necessary from among the membership of the board of commissioners. (3)  A majority of the board of commissioners membership shall constitute a quorum and all official action of the board of commissioners shall require a quorum. (4)  The board of commissioners shall have authority to employ such employees, experts and consultants as it may deem necessary to assist the board of commissioners in the discharge of its responsibilities to the extent that funds are made available. (5)  In lieu of appointing a board of commissioners, the board of supervisors of the county may serve as the board of commissioners of the district, in which case it shall assume all the powers and duties of the board of commissioners as provided in Section 19-5-301 et seq. (6)  From and after the adoption of the State NG911 Plan, all emergency communications districts shall purchase, lease or lease-purchase any new equipment used to comply with requirements consistent with the State NG911 Plan from a products and equipment list maintained by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services; however, items not available from the list, or items which may be purchased at a lower price, shall be purchased in accordance with the Public Purchasing Law (Section 31-7-13). SECTION 5.  Section 23-15-165, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 23-15-165.  (1)  The Office of the Secretary of State, in cooperation with the county registrars and election commissioners, shall procure, implement and maintain an electronic information processing system and programs capable of maintaining a centralized database of all registered voters in the state.  The system shall encompass software and hardware, at both the state and county level, software development training, conversion and support and maintenance for the system. The Secretary of State shall equip the Statewide Elections Management System with appropriate security measures to protect private information of the registered voter and the integrity of Mississippi elections.  This system shall be known as the "Statewide Elections Management System" and shall constitute the official record of registered voters in every county of the state. (2)  The Office of the Secretary of State shall develop and implement the Statewide Elections Management System so that the registrar and election commissioners of each county shall: (a)  Verify that an applicant that is registering to vote in that county is not registered to vote in another county; (b)  Be notified automatically that a registered voter in its county has registered to vote in another county; (c)  Receive regular reports of death, changes of address and convictions for disenfranchising crimes that apply to voters registered in the county; (d)  Retain all present functionality related to, but not limited to, the use of voter roll data and to implement such other functionality as the law requires to enhance the maintenance of accurate county voter records and related jury selection and redistricting programs; and (e)  When evidence exists that a registered voter may not be a citizen of the United States as provided in Section 23-15-15, send notification to the registrar of the location where the person is registered to vote. (3)  As a part of the procurement and implementation of the system, the Office of the Secretary of State shall, with the assistance of the advisory committee, procure services necessary to convert current voter registration records in the counties into a standard, industry accepted file format that can be used on the Statewide Elections Management System.  Thereafter, all official voter information shall be maintained on the Statewide Elections Management System.  The standard industry accepted format of data  was reviewed and approved by a majority of the advisory committee created in subsection (5) of this section after consultation with the Circuit Clerks Association and the format may not be changed without consulting the Circuit Clerks Association. (4)  The Secretary of State may, with the assistance of the advisory committee, adopt rules and regulations necessary to administer the Statewide Elections Management System.  The rules and regulations shall at least: (a)  Provide for the establishment and maintenance of a centralized database for all voter registration information in the state; (b)  Provide procedures for integrating data into the centralized database; (c)  Provide security to ensure that only the registrar, or his or her designee or other appropriate official, as the law may require, can add information to, delete information from and modify information in the system; (d)  Provide the registrar or his or her designee or other appropriate official, as the law may require, access to the system at all times, including the ability to download copies of the industry standard file, for all purposes related to their official duties, including, but not limited to, exclusive access for the purpose of printing all local pollbooks; (e)  Provide security and protection of all information in the system and monitor the system to ensure that unauthorized access is not allowed; (f)  Provide a procedure that will allow the registrar, or his or her designee or other appropriate official, as the law may require, to identify the precinct to which a voter should be assigned; and (g)  Provide a procedure for phasing in or converting existing manual and computerized voter registration systems in counties to the Statewide Elections Management System. (5)  The Secretary of State established an advisory committee to assist in developing system specifications, procurement, implementation and maintenance of the Statewide Elections Management System.  The committee included two (2) representatives from the Circuit Clerks Association, appointed by the association; two (2) representatives from the Election Commissioners Association of Mississippi, appointed by the association; one (1) member of the Mississippi Association of Supervisors, or its staff, appointed by the association; the Director of the Stennis Institute of Government at Mississippi State University, or his or her designee; the Executive Director of the Department of Information Technology Services, or his or her designee; two (2) persons knowledgeable about elections and information technology appointed by the Secretary of State; and the Secretary of State, who shall serve as the chair of the advisory committee. (6)  (a)  Social security numbers, telephone numbers, email addresses, and date of birth and age information in statewide, district, county and municipal voter registration files shall be exempt from and shall not be subject to inspection, examination, copying or reproduction under the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983. (b)  Copies of statewide, district, county or municipal voter registration files, excluding social security numbers, telephone numbers, email addresses, and date of birth and age information, shall be provided to any person in accordance with the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983 at a cost not to exceed the actual cost of production. SECTION 6.  Section 25-53-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-1.  The Legislature recognizes that in order for the State of Mississippi to receive the maximum use and benefit from information technology and services now in operation or which will in the future be placed in operation, there should be full cooperation and cohesive planning and effort by and between the several state agencies and that it is the responsibility of the Legislature to provide statutory authority therefor.  The Legislature, therefore, declares and determines that for these and other related purposes there is hereby established an agency of state government to be known as the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services (MDITS).  The Legislature further declares that the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services (MDITS) shall provide statewide services that facilitate cost-effective information processing and telecommunication solutions.  State agencies shall work in full cooperation with the board of MDITS to identify opportunities to minimize duplication, reduce costs and improve the efficiency of providing common technology services across agency boundaries.  The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the Department of Health and the Department of Revenue for the purposes of implementing, administering and enforcing the provisions of the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act, for acquisitions made before June 30, 2024. SECTION 7.  Section 25-53-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-3.  (1)  Whenever the term "Central Data Processing Authority" or the term "authority," when referring to the Central Data Processing Authority, is used in any law, rule, regulation, document or elsewhere, it shall be construed to mean the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services. (2)  For the purposes of this chapter the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context otherwise requires: (a)  "Central Data Processing Authority" and "CDPA" mean "Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services (ITS)" and the term "authority" means "board of the ITS." (b)  "Bureau of Systems Policy and Planning," "Bureau of Telecommunications," "Bureau of Central Data Processing" and "bureau" mean "ITS." (c) "Acquisition" of information technology means the purchase, lease, rental, or acquisition in any other manner of any such information technology. (d)  "Agency" means and includes all the various state agencies, officers, departments, boards, commissions, offices and institutions of the state. (e)  "Governing authority" means boards of supervisors, governing boards of all school districts, all boards of directors of public water supply districts, boards of directors of master public water supply districts, municipal public utility commissions, governing authorities of all municipalities, port authorities, commissioners and boards of trustees of any public hospitals and any governing authority of the state supported wholly or in part by public funds of the state or governing authority thereof. (f)  "Bid" means any of the valid source selection techniques and competitive procurement methods appropriate to information technology procurement in the public sector, including, but not limited to, competitive sealed bidding, competitive sealed proposals, simplified small purchase procedures, sole source procurements, and emergency procurements. (g) "Telecommunications transmission facility" means any transmission medium, switch, instrument, inside wiring system or other facility which is used, in whole or part, to provide any transmission. (h)  "Equipment support contract" means a contract which covers a single, specific class or classes of telecommunications equipment or service and all features associated with that class, through which state agencies may purchase or lease the item of equipment or service specified by issuing a purchase order under the terms of the contract without the necessity of further competitive bidding. (i)  "Inside wiring system" means any wiring which: (i)  Directly or indirectly, interconnects any terminal equipment with any other terminal equipment or with any regulated facility or common carrier services; and (ii)  Is located at the premises of the customer and is not inside any terminal equipment. (j) "Procurement" means the selling, buying, purchasing, renting, leasing or otherwise obtaining information technology as well as activities engaged in, resulting in or expected to result in selling, buying, purchasing, renting, leasing or otherwise obtaining information technology. (k) "Telecommunications equipment, systems, related services" are limited to the equipment and means to provide: (i) Telecommunications transmission facilities. (ii)  Telephone systems, including voice processing systems. (iii)  Facsimile systems. (iv)  Radio paging services. (v)  Mobile telephone services, including cellular mobile telephone service. (vi)  Intercom and paging systems. (vii)  Video teleconferencing systems. (viii)  Personal communications networks and services. (ix)  Any and all systems based on emerging and future telecommunications technologies relative to (i) through (viii) above. (l) "Telecommunications system lease contract" means a contract between a supplier of telecommunications systems, including equipment and related services, and the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services. (m)  "Tariffed or regulated service" means telecommunications service offered by common carriers and subject to control by the Mississippi Public Service Commission or the Federal Communications Commission. (n)  "State Data Center" means one or more facilities operated by ITS to provide information technology resources requiring enterprise computing resources or any other ITS managed information resources. (o)  "Information technology" means any technology as defined by ITS, including, but not limited to, computer and/or telecommunications equipment, systems or related services. SECTION 8.  Section 25-53-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-5.  The authority shall have the following powers, duties, and responsibilities: (a)  The authority shall provide for the development of plans for the efficient acquisition and utilization of information technology by all agencies of state government, and provide for their implementation.  In so doing, the authority may use the ITS' staff, at the discretion of the executive director of the authority, or the authority may contract for the services of qualified consulting firms in the field of information technology and utilize the service of such consultants as may be necessary for such purposes. (b)  The authority shall immediately institute procedures for carrying out the purposes of this chapter and supervise the efficient execution of the powers and duties of the executive director of the ITS.  In the execution of its functions under this chapter, the authority shall maintain as a paramount consideration the successful internal organization and operation of the several agencies so that efficiency existing therein shall not be adversely affected or impaired.  In executing its functions in relation to the institutions of higher learning and junior colleges in the state, the authority shall take into consideration the special needs of such institutions in relation to the fields of teaching and scientific research. (c)  The authority shall adopt rules, regulations, and procedures governing the acquisition of information technology which shall, to the fullest extent practicable, ensure the maximum of competition between all manufacturers of supplies or equipment or services.  In the writing of specifications, in the making of contracts relating to the acquisition of such information technology, and in the performance of its other duties the authority shall provide for the maximum compatibility of all information systems hereafter installed or utilized by all state agencies and may require the use of common computer languages where necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.  The authority may establish by regulation and charge reasonable fees on a nondiscriminatory basis for the furnishing to bidders of copies of bid specifications and other documents issued by the authority. (d)  The authority shall adopt rules and regulations governing the sharing with, or the sale or lease of information technology services to any nonstate agency or person. Such regulations shall provide that any such sharing, sale or lease shall be restricted in that same shall be accomplished only where such services are not readily available otherwise within the state, and then only at a charge to the user not less than the prevailing rate of charge for similar services by private enterprise within this state. (e)  The authority may, in its discretion, establish a special technical advisory committee or committees to study and make recommendations on matters within the competence of the authority as the authority may see fit.  Persons serving on any such committees shall be entitled to receive their actual and necessary expenses actually incurred in the performance of such duties, together with mileage as provided by law for state employees, provided the same has been authorized by a resolution duly adopted by the authority and entered on its minutes prior to the performance of such duties.  For the purposes of this paragraph, such committee meetings are exempt from the requirements of Sections 25-41-1 through 25-41-17. (f)  The authority may provide for the development and require the adoption of standardized computer programs and may provide for the dissemination of information to and the establishment of training programs for the personnel of the various information technology centers of state agencies and personnel of the agencies utilizing the services thereof. (g)  The authority shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations requiring the reporting to the authority through the office of executive director of such information as may be required for carrying out the purposes of this chapter and may also establish such reasonable procedures to be followed in the presentation of bills for payment under the terms of all contracts for the acquisition of information technology now or hereafter in force as may be required by the authority or by the executive director in the execution of their powers and duties. (h)  The authority shall require such adequate documentation of information technology procedures utilized by the various state agencies and may require the establishment of such organizational structures within state agencies relating to information technology operations as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter. (i)  The authority may adopt such further reasonable rules and regulations as may be necessary to fully implement the purposes of this chapter.  All rules and regulations adopted by the authority shall be published in readily accessible form to all affected state agencies, and to all current suppliers of computer equipment and services to the state, and to all prospective suppliers requesting the same. Such rules and regulations shall be kept current, be periodically revised, and copies thereof shall be available at all times for inspection by the public at reasonable hours in the offices of the authority.  Whenever possible no rule, regulation or any proposed amendment to such rules and regulations shall be finally adopted or enforced until copies of the proposed rules and regulations have been published. (j)  The authority shall establish rules and regulations which shall provide for the submission of all contracts proposed to be executed by the executive director for information technology, including cloud computing, to the authority for approval before final execution, and the authority may provide that such contracts involving the expenditure of less than such specified amount as may be established by the authority may be finally executed by the executive director without first obtaining such approval by the authority. (k)  The authority is authorized to consider new technologies, such as cloud computing, to purchase, lease, or rent information technology and to operate that information technology when in its opinion such operation will provide maximum efficiency and economy in the functions of any such agency or agencies. (l)  Upon the request of the governing body of a political subdivision or instrumentality, the authority shall assist the political subdivision or instrumentality in its development of plans for the efficient acquisition and utilization of information technology.  An appropriate fee shall be charged the political subdivision by the authority for such assistance. (m)  The authority shall adopt rules and regulations governing the protest procedures to be followed by any actual or prospective bidder, offerer or contractor who is aggrieved in connection with the solicitation or award of a contract for the acquisition of information technology.  Such rules and regulations shall prescribe the manner, time and procedure for making protests and may provide that a protest not timely filed shall be summarily denied.  The authority may require the protesting party, at the time of filing the protest, to post a bond, payable to the state, in an amount that the authority determines sufficient to cover any expense or loss incurred by the state; however, in no event may the amount of the bond required exceed a reasonable estimate of the total project cost.  The authority, in its discretion, also may prohibit any prospective bidder, offerer or contractor who is a party to any protest or litigation involving any such contract with the state, the authority or any agency of the state to participate in any other such bid, offer or contract, or to be awarded any such contract, during the pendency of the protest or litigation. (n)  The authority shall make a report in writing to the Legislature each year in the month of January.  Such report shall contain a full and detailed account of the work of the authority for the preceding year as specified in Section 25-53-29(3). All acquisitions of information technology involving the expenditure of funds in excess of the dollar amount established in Section 31-7-13(c), or rentals or leases in excess of the dollar amount established in Section 31-7-13(c) for the term of the contract, shall be based upon bid.  The authority may reserve the right to reject any or all bids, and if all bids are rejected, the authority may negotiate a contract within the limitations of the specifications so long as the terms of any such negotiated contract are equal to or better than the lowest bidder, and so long as the total cost to the State of Mississippi does not exceed the lowest bid.  If the authority accepts one (1) of such bids, it shall be that which is the lowest and best.  The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to acquisitions of information technology equipment and services made by the Mississippi Department of Health and the Mississippi Department of Revenue for the purposes of implementing, administering and enforcing the provisions of the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act by June 30, 2024. (o)  When applicable, the authority may procure information technology in accordance with the law or regulations, or both, which govern the Bureau of Purchasing of the Office of General Services or which govern the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services procurement of information technology. (p)  The authority is authorized to purchase, lease, or rent information technology for the purpose of establishing pilot projects to investigate emerging technologies.  These acquisitions shall be limited to new technologies and shall be limited to an amount set by annual appropriation of the Legislature.  These acquisitions shall be exempt from the advertising and bidding requirement. (q)  To promote the maximum use and benefit from technology and services now in operation or which will in the future be placed in operation and to identify opportunities, minimize duplication, reduce costs and improve the efficiency of providing common technology services the authority is authorized to: (i)  Enter into master agreements for information technology, including cloud computing, available for shared use by state agencies, institutions of higher learning and governing authorities; and (ii)  Enter into contracts for the acquisition of information technology, including cloud computing, that have been acquired by other entities, located within or outside of the State of Mississippi, so long as it is determined by the authority to be in the best interest of the state.  The acquisitions provided in this paragraph (q) shall be exempt from the advertising and bidding requirements of Sections 25-53-1 et seq. and 31-7-1 et seq. (r)  All fees collected by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall be deposited into the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services Revolving Fund unless otherwise specified by the Legislature. (s)  The authority shall work closely with the council to bring about effective coordination of policies, standards and procedures relating to procurement of remote sensing and geographic information systems (GIS) resources. (t)  The authority shall manage one or more State Data Centers to provide information technology services on a cost-sharing basis.  In determining the appropriate services to be provided through the State Data Center, the authority should consider those services that: (i)  Result in savings to the state as a whole; (ii)  Improve and enhance the security and reliability of the state's information and business systems; and (iii)  Optimize the efficient use of the state's information technology assets, including, but not limited to, promoting partnerships with the state institutions of higher learning and community colleges to capitalize on advanced information technology resources. (u)  The authority shall oversee the Mississippi Statewide Data Exchange, ensuring compliance with the requirements of Section 25-53-281.  The Department of Information Technology Services shall have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations necessary to develop, implement and oversee the Mississippi Statewide Data Exchange.  The department shall engage with state agencies and other stakeholders to identify data-sharing opportunities and address potential barriers.  Additionally, the department shall establish a Chief Information Officer (CIO) Council, composed of information technology leadership from state agencies, to provide strategic oversight, promote interoperability and recommend policies to enhance the effectiveness and security of statewide data-sharing initiatives. (v)  The authority shall increase federal participation in the cost of the State Data Center to the extent provided by law and its shared technology infrastructure through providing such shared services to agencies that receive federal funds.  With regard to state institutions of higher learning and community colleges, the authority may provide shared services when mutually agreeable, following a determination by both the authority and the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning or the Mississippi Community College Board, as the case may be, that the sharing of services is mutually beneficial. (w)  The authority, in its discretion, may require new or replacement agency business applications to be hosted at the State Data Center.  With regard to state institutions of higher learning and community colleges, the authority and the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning or the Mississippi Community College Board, as the case may be, may agree that institutions of higher learning or community colleges may utilize business applications that are hosted at the State Data Center, following a determination by both the authority and the applicable board that the hosting of those applications is mutually beneficial. In addition, the authority may establish partnerships to capitalize on the advanced technology resources of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning or the Mississippi Community College Board, following a determination by both the authority and the applicable board that such a partnership is mutually beneficial. (x)  The authority shall provide a periodic update regarding reform-based information technology initiatives to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Accountability, Efficiency and Transparency Committees. From and after July 1, 2018, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund.  In addition, in order to receive the maximum use and benefit from information technology and services, expenses for the provision of statewide shared services that facilitate cost-effective information technology shall be defrayed by pass-through funding and shall be deposited into the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services Revolving Fund unless otherwise specified by the Legislature.  These funds shall only be utilized to pay the actual costs incurred by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services for providing these shared services to state agencies.  Furthermore, state agencies shall work in full cooperation with the Board of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services to identify information technology to minimize duplication, reduce costs, and improve the efficiency of providing common technology services across agency boundaries. SECTION 9.  Section 25-53-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-7.  (1)  The membership of the authority shall be composed of five (5) members to be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate.  The initial terms of the members shall be for one (1), two (2), three (3), four (4) and five (5) years, respectively, and thereafter all terms shall be for five (5) years.  Each member may continue to serve for a period not to exceed twelve (12) months after the expiration of his term if his successor is not duly appointed.  The initial appointments to the reconstituted authority shall be made no later than June 30, 1984, for terms to begin on July 1, 1984.  Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as original appointments for the unexpired portion of the term vacated.  Each member of the authority shall have a minimum of four (4) years' experience in an information technology-related executive position or prior service as a member of the authority. (2)  Each member of the authority shall be required to furnish a surety bond in the minimum amount of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) to be approved by the Secretary of State, conditioned according to law and payable to the State of Mississippi, before entering upon his duties.  The premiums on such bonds shall be paid from any funds available to the authority for such purpose. (3)  No member of the authority, nor its executive director, shall, during his term as such member or director, have any substantial beneficial interest in any corporation or other organization engaged in the information technology business either as manufacturer, supplier, lessor, or otherwise.  All members and the executive director shall fully disclose in writing any such beneficial interest, and such disclosure shall be entered on the minutes of the authority. (4)  The Lieutenant Governor may designate one (1) Senator and the Speaker of the House of Representatives may designate one (1) Representative to attend any meeting of the authority. The appointing authorities may designate an alternate member from their respective houses to serve when the regular designee is unable to attend such meetings of the authority.  Such legislative designees shall have no jurisdiction or vote on any matter within the jurisdiction of the authority. For attending meetings of the authority, such legislators shall receive per diem and expenses which shall be paid from the contingent expense funds of their respective houses in the same amounts as provided for committee meetings when the Legislature is not in session; however, no per diem and expenses for attending meetings of the authority will be paid while the Legislature is in session.  No per diem and expenses will be paid except for attending meetings of the authority without prior approval of the proper committee in their respective houses. SECTION 10.  Section 25-53-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-9.  The members of the authority shall be compensated by a per diem as is authorized by Section 25-3-69 for each day spent in actual discharge of their duties, and shall be reimbursed for mileage and actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in Section 25-3-41.  No authority member may incur per diem, travel, or other expenses unless previously authorized by vote at a meeting of the authority, which action shall be recorded in the official minutes of said meeting. SECTION 11.  Section 25-53-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-11.  The authority shall meet regularly at a place designated by it once each calendar month and shall meet at such other times as may be set upon call of the chairman or a majority of the members of the authority.  At its first meeting, the authority shall organize and elect a chairman and vice chairman and, as soon as practicable thereafter, the authority shall adopt such rules and regulations, not contrary to the provisions of this chapter and the other laws of the State of Mississippi, as shall be necessary and proper to govern its proceedings. The authority may either elect a secretary from among its membership or delegate the executive director or another employee of the authority as its secretary. SECTION 12.  Section 25-53-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-13.  In order to have a quorum for a meeting of the authority, at least three (3) members of the authority must be present. SECTION 13.  Section 25-53-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-15.  Any member of the authority may have his vote on any question before the authority recorded on the minutes thereof at the time of the vote, and a member of the authority who votes against an illegal or unauthorized expenditure of funds may not be held liable therefor. SECTION 14.  Section 25-53-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-17.  The authority shall keep full, complete, and permanent minutes and records of all its proceedings, including the rules and regulations adopted by it, and said minutes shall be signed by the chairman, or vice-chairman, and attested by the secretary. SECTION 15.  Section 25-53-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-19.  The authority shall select an executive director, with the advice and consent of the Senate, who shall be the administrative officer of the authority and shall perform such duties as are required of him by law and such other duties as may be assigned him by the authority, and who shall receive such compensation as may be fixed by the authority, subject to the approval of the state personnel board.  In addition, he shall be entitled to remuneration for his necessary traveling expenses consistent with general law. The executive director shall be a graduate of an accredited university with a degree in engineering, business administration, electronic communications, information technology or a related field, with at least ten (10) years' experience in information technology, electronic communications, or a related field, of which at least five (5) years shall be in a responsible high level management position with a demonstrated record of management expertise demonstrated through knowledge in the application of information technology and electronic communications.  The qualifications for the executive director prescribed herein shall not apply to the executive director serving on June 30, 1984. The executive director shall have no vote in the decisions of said authority, but shall offer such professional or technical advice and assistance to the authority as may be required of him.  Said executive director, in order to qualify for his position, shall be required to make a good and sufficient bond in some surety company qualified and doing business in the State of Mississippi, in the minimum penal sum of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) conditioned upon the faithful performance of his duties as required by law and the directives of the authority.  The premium on said bond shall be paid from any funds available to the authority for such purpose.  Said executive director may be removed at any time upon a majority vote of the membership of said authority. The executive director, with the approval of the authority, shall employ such technical, professional, and clerical help as may be authorized by the authority; and the authority, upon the recommendation of the executive director, shall define the duties and fix the compensation of such employees. SECTION 16.  Section 25-53-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-21.  The executive director shall have the following duties, responsibilities and authority: (a)  He shall conduct continuing studies of all information technology activities carried out by all agencies of the state and shall develop a long-range plan for the efficient and economical performance of such activities in state government.  Such plan shall be submitted to the authority for its approval and, having been approved by the authority, shall be implemented by the executive director and all state agencies.  Such plan shall be continuously reviewed and modifications thereof shall be proposed to the authority by the executive director as developments in information technology techniques and changes in the structure, activities, and functions of state government may require. (b)  He shall review the purchasing practices of all state agencies in the area of the purchasing of supplies for information technology and make recommendations to the authority for the institution of purchasing procedures which will ensure the most economical procurement of such supplies commensurate with the efficient operation of all departments and agencies of state government. (c)  He shall see that all reports required of all agencies are promptly and accurately made in accordance with the rules and regulations adopted by the authority.  Either in person or through his authorized agents, he shall make such inspections of information technology operations being conducted by any of the agencies of the state as may be necessary for the performance of his duties. (d)  He shall suggest and cause to be brought about cooperation between the several state agencies in order to provide efficiency in information technology operation.  He shall, together with the heads of the agencies involved, reduce to writing and execute cooperative plans for the acquisition and operation of information technology equipment, and any such plan so adopted shall be carried out in accordance with the provisions of such plan unless the same shall be amended by the joint action of the executive director and the heads of agencies involved.  The executive director shall report to the authority the details of any plan so adopted and all amendments or modifications thereof, and shall otherwise report to the authority any failure on the part of any agency to carry out the provisions of such plan.  In the event the head of any agency involved or the executive director shall propose amendments to a plan so adopted and such amendment is disapproved by the head of another agency involved or the executive director, an appeal may be taken to the authority which may, after full consideration thereof, order the adoption of the proposed amendment or any modification thereof.  The executive director shall make decisions on all questions of the division of the cost of information technology operations among the several agencies, but his findings shall be subject to the approval or modification by the authority on appeal to it. (e)  He shall review all contracts for acquisition of information technology now or hereafter in force and may require the renegotiation, termination, amendment or execution of any such contracts in proper form and in accordance with the policies and rules and regulations and subject to the direction of the authority.  A contract that expires by its terms may be renewed if it is the intent of all parties to renew the contract within a reasonable timeframe.  In the negotiation and execution of such contracts, the executive director may negotiate a limitation on the liability to the state of prospective contractors provided such limitation affords the state reasonable protection and the limitation is approved by the state entity for whom the acquisition is being made.  For purposes of this section, reasonable protection does not include limitations on intentional torts, negligence, death, bodily injury, bad faith, breach of state data, infringement issues and damage to tangible state property. (f)  He shall act as the purchasing and contracting agent for the State of Mississippi in the negotiation and execution of all contracts for the acquisition of information technology.  He shall receive, review, and promptly approve or disapprove all requests of agencies of the state for the acquisition of information technology, which are submitted in accordance with rules and regulations of the authority.  In the event that any such request is disapproved, he shall immediately notify the requesting agency and the members of the authority in writing of such disapproval, stating his reasons therefor.  The disapproval of any request by the executive director of the authority may be appealed to the authority in such manner as may be authorized by such reasonable rules and regulations hereby authorized to be adopted by the authority.  The executive director shall report the approval of all such requests to the authority in such manner as may be directed by the authority, and shall execute any such contracts only after complying with rules and regulations which may be adopted by the authority in relation thereto.  Any contracts for personal or professional services entered into by the executive director shall be exempted from the requirements of Section 25-9-120(3) relating to submission of such contract to the State Personal Service Contract Review Board. (g)  He shall suggest and cause to be brought about cooperation between the several state agencies, departments and institutions in order that work may be done by one agency for another agency, and equipment in one agency may be made available to another agency, and suggest and cause to be brought about such improvements as may be necessary in joint or cooperative information technology operations. (h)  He shall be designated as the "Chief Information Confidentiality Officer" after being duly sworn to the oath of this office by the chairman of the authority and shall be responsible for administering the oath to other qualified officers he may designate. (i)  He shall appoint employees of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services, or at his discretion, employees of other state agencies and institutions that are responsible for handling or processing data for any agency or institution other than that for which they are employed, to a position of information custodial care that shall be known as "Information Confidentiality Officer." The selection and swearing of all officers shall be reported to the authority at the next regular meeting and names, affirmation dates and employment dates shall be recorded in the permanent minutes of the authority. SECTION 17.  Section 25-53-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-23.  The authority shall act upon all appeals of decisions made by the executive director thereof and shall, upon such appeals, approve or disapprove such administrative actions as may be taken by him.  The form of an appeal to the full authority from an action or recommendation of the executive director thereof shall be a written communication from the executive head of the agency or agencies involved to the chairman of the authority, stating the objection and a request to appear before the full authority to present the case in point, on which appeal the authority shall take such action as is indicated by the facts presented to or made available to the authority. SECTION 18.  Section 25-53-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-25.  (1)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 25-53-5, 25-53-25(5) or any other provision of law, nothing in this chapter shall be construed to imply exemption from the public purchases law, being Section 31-7-1 et seq. (2)  The authority may establish policies and procedures for the purpose of delegating the acquisition and contracting responsibilities related to the procurement of information technology to the purchasing agency.  Such policies and procedures must address the following issues: (a)  Establish categories of equipment or services affected; (b)  Establish maximum unit and/or ceiling prices of such procurements; (c)  Establish reporting, monitoring and control of such procurements; and (d)  Establish other such rules and regulations as necessary to fully implement the purposes of this section.  Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to imply exemption from the public purchases law, being Section 31-7-1 et seq. (3)  Acquisitions of information technology by institutions of higher learning or junior colleges wholly with federal funds and not with state general funds shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter; however, nothing in this subsection shall be construed to imply an exemption of such acquisitions from the public purchases law, being Section 31-7-1 et seq. (4)  [Repealed] (5)  Acquisitions of information technology made by agencies while exempt from the public purchasing requirements of this chapter and/or as specified in the authority's regulations shall remain exempt until a new acquisition is required, as determined by ITS. SECTION 19.  Section 25-53-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-29.  (1)  For the purposes of this section the term "bureau" shall mean the "Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services."  The authority shall have the following powers and responsibilities to carry out the establishment of policy and provide for long-range planning and consulting: (a)  Provide a high level of technical expertise for agencies, institutions, political subdivisions and other governmental entities as follows:  planning; consulting; project management; systems and performance review; system definition; design; application programming; training; development and documentation; implementation; maintenance; and other tasks as may be required, within the resources available to the bureau. (b)  Publish written planning guides, policies and procedures for use by agencies and institutions in planning future information technology.  The bureau may require agencies and institutions to submit data, including periodic electronic equipment inventory listings, information on agency staffing, systems under study, planned applications for the future, and other information needed for the purposes of preparing the state master plan.  The bureau may require agencies and institutions to submit any additional data required for purposes of preparing the state master plan. (c)  Inspect agency facilities and equipment, interview agency employees and review records at any time deemed necessary by the bureau for the purpose of identifying cost-effective applications of electronic information technology.  Upon conclusion of any inspection, the bureau shall issue a management letter containing cost estimates and recommendations to the agency head and governing board concerning applications identified that would result in staff reductions, other monetary savings and improved delivery of public services. (d)  Conduct classroom and on-site training for end users for applications and systems developed by the bureau. (e)  Provide consulting services to agencies and institutions or Mississippi governmental subdivisions requesting technical assistance in information technology.  The bureau may submit proposals and enter into contracts to provide services to agencies and institutions or governmental subdivisions for such purposes. (2)  The bureau shall annually issue a three-year master plan in writing to the Governor, available on request to any member of the Legislature, including recommended statewide strategies and goals for the effective and efficient use of information technology in state government.  The report shall also include recommended information policy actions and other recommendations for consideration by the Governor and members of the Legislature. (3)  The bureau shall make an annual report in writing to the Governor, available on request to any member of the Legislature, to include a full and detailed account of the work of the authority for the preceding year.  The report shall contain recommendations to agencies and institutions resulting from inspections or consulting contracts. The report shall also contain a summary of the master plan, progress made, and legislative and policy recommendations for consideration by the Governor and members of the Legislature. (4)  The bureau may charge fees to agencies and institutions for services rendered to them.  The bureau may charge fees to vendors to recover the cost of providing procurement services and  the delivery of procurement awards to public bodies.  The amounts of such fees shall be set by the authority upon recommendation of the Executive Director of the ITS, and all such fees collected shall be paid into the fund established for carrying out the purposes of this section. (5)  The bureau may, from time to time, at the discretion of the Executive Director of ITS, contract with firms or qualified individuals to be used to augment the bureau's professional staff in order to assure timely completion and implementation of assigned tasks, provided that funds are available in the fund established for carrying out the purposes of this section.  Such individuals may be employees of any agency, bureau or institution provided that these individuals or firms meet the requirements of other individuals or firms doing business with the state through the ITS.  Individuals who are employees of an agency or institution may contract with the ITS only with the concurrence of the agency or institution for whom they are employed. From and after July 1, 2018, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund.  In addition, in order to receive the maximum use and benefit from information technology, expenses for the provision of statewide shared services that facilitate cost-effective information processing and telecommunication solutions shall be defrayed by pass-through funding and shall be deposited into the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services Revolving Fund unless otherwise specified by the Legislature.  These funds shall only be utilized to pay the actual costs incurred by the ITS for providing these shared services to state agencies.  Furthermore, state agencies shall work in full cooperation with the ITS to identify information technology to minimize duplication, reduce costs, and improve the efficiency of providing common technology services across agency boundaries. SECTION 20.  Section 25-53-51, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-51.  (1)  To qualify for the position of information confidentiality officer a person must: (a)  Be an employee of a state agency or institution in a position such that his duties require him to handle or process or supervise the handling or processing of data in conjunction with the use of automated information technology equipment for an agency or institution other than that for whom he is regularly employed. (b)  Have been continuously employed for a period of at least one hundred eighty (180) days by such agency or institution or have successfully been cleared for employment through an investigation that shall consist of a determination as to good moral character and that the prospective employee has not been convicted of a felony. In order to determine the applicant's suitability for employment at the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services, the applicant shall be fingerprinted.  If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded by the Mississippi Department of Public Safety to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check.  A prospective employee may be provisionally employed based on a reference check by the employing agency pending final receipt of the results of a national criminal history record check for a period not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days. (c)  Successfully complete a suitable instructional course on the subjects of information security, privacy and confidentiality and protection, to be developed and taught under the supervision of the executive director.  An employee may work in a provisional capacity under the direct supervision of an information confidentiality officer as part of an on-the-job training program while completing instructional requirements, for a period not to exceed ninety (90) days. (d)  Be duly sworn to the following oath:  "I, ______, do solemnly swear to protect and uphold the confidentiality of all information that may come to my knowledge that is designated as 'confidential information' by another state agency or institution for which I may handle or process in the normal course of my duties.  I swear to exercise reasonable care in the handling and processing of all such designated data and further that I will not reveal or otherwise divulge information from such data obtained.  I understand that proven violation of this oath will subject me to forfeiture of my bond and dismissal from employment." (2)  In order to maintain appropriate liability insurance necessary to cover damages for any nonmalicious act, the Department of Information Technology Services will work in conjunction with the Tort Claims Board. (3)  In order to clear vendors, such as maintenance personnel, security personnel, cleaning personnel, contractors and other vendors with a valid need to gain access into the State Data Centers and campus, the department shall determine these individuals have not been convicted of a felony through a fingerprint-based criminal history background check.  If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded by the Department of Public Safety to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check. SECTION 21.  Section 25-53-53, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-53.  Information and data shall be considered public record information and data and receive normal handling and processing unless designated as "confidential information" by the agency and institution originating the data. Information and data designated as "confidential information" will receive special handling based on procedures agreed to by the executive director and the agency or institution head and shall be handled in accordance with the oath subscribed to by the confidentiality officer. SECTION 22.  Section 25-53-55, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-55.  Upon written complaint of any person claiming to be adversely affected by disclosure of confidential information by any information confidentiality officer, the director shall give notice to the information confidentiality officer of the fact that such complaint has been filed and shall give such notice to the Chairman of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services, who shall call a meeting of the members of the authority for the purpose of hearing such complaint.  The authority shall then conduct an investigation into the matter and shall afford to the complaining party and the information confidentiality officer a hearing, of which reasonable notice shall be given. For purposes of such hearing, the authority, under signature of the secretary of the authority attested by the chairman, shall have the power to subpoena witnesses and documentary or other evidence.  After such hearing, if the authority, based upon substantial evidence, shall find that the information confidentiality officer has disclosed confidential information in violation of his oath, the authority shall enter such finding of fact on its minutes and the information confidentiality officer shall be immediately discharged from employment.  If the authority shall find that such oath has not been violated, it shall, likewise, enter such finding on its minutes and the complaint shall be dismissed.  The finding of the authority shall be prima facie evidence of the truth thereof in any judicial procedure seeking forfeiture of the bond of such information confidentiality officer. SECTION 23.  Section 25-53-57, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-57.  An information confidentiality officer shall be considered a legal agent of the agency or institution and for the purposes of Sections 25-53-51 through 25-53-59 shall be considered to be an employee of the agency or institution for which he may be processing data at that particular time. SECTION 24.  Section 25-53-59, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-59.  Any information confidentiality officer who shall intentionally and willfully violate his oath by releasing or divulging confidential information without proper authority shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and sentenced to not exceeding one (1) year in jail or a fine of not exceeding One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or both. SECTION 25.  Section 25-53-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-101.  The Legislature hereby declares it essential to the creation and maintenance of an efficient, modern, economically feasible, telecommunications system that there should be full cooperation and cohesive planning and effort by and between the several state agencies and that it is the responsibility of the said Legislature to provide statutory authority therefor.  The Legislature, therefore, declares and determines that the responsibility for these and other related purposes shall be vested in the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services. SECTION 26.  Section 25-53-105, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-105.  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall administer the provisions of Sections 25-53-109 through 25-53-125.  The purposes and aims of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services in carrying out said provisions shall be to coordinate and promote efficiency in the acquisition, operation and maintenance of all telecommunications systems and networks being used by agencies of the state and further to coordinate the compatibility of systems and networks to the state with those of governing authorities so as to promote a uniform, compatible telecommunications system for agencies and governing authorities. SECTION 27.  Section 25-53-107, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-107.  (1)  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the manner in which the authority and duties prescribed by Sections 25-53-101 through 25-53-125 shall be carried out.  It shall employ competent personnel necessary to carry out its purposes, under rules promulgated by the State Personnel Board. (2)  The bureau, during a fiscal year, may utilize time-limited escalated positions in order to implement telecommunications enterprise decisions that yield cost avoidance, cost reductions or revenue increases and so long as the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services can provide the necessary funds without such action causing a telephone service rate increase to agency customers.  Such employees of the bureau shall be considered nonstate service employees, shall be highly qualified telecommunications professionals and may be compensated at a rate comparable to the prevailing rate of telecommunications personnel in the private sector.  Such compensation rates shall be determined by the State Personnel Director.  The number of such positions shall be set by annual appropriation legislation.  The compensation and classification of such positions and qualifications of employees shall be set by the State Personnel Board upon recommendation by the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services.  Nonstate service positions can be recommended for conversion to permanent state service on a case by case basis if the supported function appears long-term in duration, if accomplished in accordance with State Personnel Board procedures, and if properly identified in the state budgetary process. SECTION 28.  Section 25-53-109, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-109.  The bureau is hereby authorized and empowered to exercise such duties and powers necessary to effectuate the purposes of Sections 25-53-101 through 25-53-125 including the following: (a)  Form an advisory council made up of persons with expertise, and experience in the field of telecommunications for the purpose of setting goals, establishing long-range plans and policies and to oversee and assist in the procurement activities regarding telecommunications equipment and services; (b)  Provide more effective management of state telecommunications resources and implement long-range plans and procurement; (c)  Manage, plan and coordinate all telecommunications systems under the jurisdiction of the state. This centralized management function would be provided throughout the following activities: (i)  Administration of existing systems including coordination of activities, vendors, service orders and billing/record-keeping functions; (ii)  Planning of new systems or services; (iii)  Design of replacement systems; (iv)  Project management during specification writing, bid letting, proposal evaluation and contract negotiations; (v)  Implementation supervision of new systems and ongoing support; (vi)  Implementation of long-term state plans; and (vii)  Management of intra-LATA and inter-LATA networks. SECTION 29.  Section 25-53-111, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-111.  The bureau shall have the following additional duties: (a)  To establish and coordinate through either state ownership or commercial leasing, all telecommunications systems and services affecting the management and operations of the state. (b)  To act as the sole centralized customer for the acquisition, billing and record keeping of all telecommunications systems or services provided to state agencies whether obtained through lease or purchase. (c)  To charge respective user agencies for their proportionate cost of the installation, maintenance and operation of the telecommunications systems and services, including the operation of the bureau. (d)  To offer or provide transmission, switch and network services on a reimbursable basis to agencies financed entirely by federal funds, to governing authorities and to other governmental agencies. (e)  To approve or provide state telephone services on a reimbursable basis to full-time students at state institutions of higher learning and junior colleges, including where such services are provided by the state or the institution. (f)  To develop coordinated telecommunications systems or services within and among all state agencies and require, where appropriate, cooperative utilization of telecommunications equipment and services by aggregating users.  Where such cooperative utilization of telecommunications system or service would affect an agency authorized to receive information from the National Crime Information Center of the Federal Bureau of Investigation, such plans for cooperative utilization shall first be approved by the National Crime Information Center before implementation of such telecommunications systems or service can proceed. (g)  To review, coordinate, approve or disapprove all requests by state agencies for the procurement, through purchase or contract for lease of telecommunications systems or services including telecommunication proposals, studies and consultation contracts and intra-LATA and inter-LATA transmission channels. (h)  To establish and define telecommunications systems and services specifications and designs so as to assure compatibility of telecommunications systems and services within state government and governing authorities. (i)  To provide a continuous, comprehensive analysis and inventory of telecommunications costs, facilities and systems within state government. (j)  To promote, coordinate or assist in the design and engineering of emergency telecommunications systems, including but not limited to "911" service, emergency medical services and other emergency telecommunications services. (k)  To advise and provide consultation to agencies and governing authorities with respect to telecommunications management planning and related matters and to provide training to users within state government in telecommunications technology and system use. (l)  To develop policies, procedures and long-range plans, consistent with the protection of citizens' rights to privacy and access to information, for the acquisition and use of telecommunications systems, and to base such policies on current information about state telecommunications activities in relation to the full range of emerging technologies. Any state agency requesting an increase in expenditure of funds for new telecommunications equipment systems or services shall submit to the Legislative Budget Office with its budget request preceding the fiscal year for which funding is requested detailed justification for such request.  The justification shall be provided on forms developed by the bureau in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.  In addition, all state agencies shall submit to the bureau, when requested, a long-range plan for use of telecommunications equipment, systems and services. SECTION 30.  Section 25-53-113, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-113.  Each and every agency of the state shall give full cooperation to the bureau in furnishing all information of any kind as it pertains to telecommunications. SECTION 31.  Section 25-53-115, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-115.  No agency shall rent, lease, lease/purchase, purchase or in any way own or pay for the operation of any telecommunications system out of any funds available for the use by that agency without the written approval of the bureau. SECTION 32.  Section 25-53-117, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-117.  No agency shall be permitted to obligate the state to any vendor source for a telecommunications system of any kind.  All transactions dealing with a telecommunications system shall be conducted through the bureau, and any vendor found in violation of this policy may be prohibited from bidding on such systems for a period of time commensurate with the severity of the violation. Provided, however, that this period shall not exceed twenty-four (24) months. SECTION 33.  Section 25-53-119, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-119.  The bureau shall, subject to the provisions of Sections 25-53-101 through 25-53-125, have sole authority and responsibility for defining the specific telecommunications equipment, systems and related services to which the provisions of Sections 25-53-101 through 25-53-125 shall be applicable.  However, the provisions of Sections 25-53-101 through 25-53-125 shall not be applicable with respect to computer and telecommunications equipment, systems and related services that are only available from a sole source. SECTION 34.  Section 25-53-121, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-121.  (1)  The types of contracts permitted in the procurement of telecommunications equipment, systems and related services are defined herein, and the provisions in Sections 25-53-101 through 25-53-125 and 25-53-5 supplement the provisions of Chapter 7, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972. (2)  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services may, on behalf of any state agency, enter into an equipment support contract with a vendor of telecommunications equipment or services for the purchase or lease of such equipment or services in accordance with the following provisions: (a)  Specifications for equipment support contracts shall be developed in advance and shall conform to the following requirements: (i)  Specifications for equipment support contracts shall cover a specific class or classes of equipment and service and may include all features associated with that class or classes. (ii) Specifications in the bid for equipment support contracts shall be developed by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services. (iii) Specifications shall be based on the projected needs of user agencies. (iv) Specifications for equipment support contracts for purchase or lease of telecommunications equipment may include specifications for the maintenance of the equipment desired. (b)  The initial procurement of an equipment support contract, and procurement of equipment and services to be utilized by agencies under an equipment support contract, shall be as follows: (i)  Equipment support contracts shall be awarded in accordance with Section 25-53-5. (ii)  A using agency may procure required telecommunications equipment and service available under an equipment support contract through release of a purchase order for the required equipment and service to the vendor holding an equipment support contract.  However, such procurement by purchase order shall be accomplished in accordance with the procedures and regulations prescribed by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services, and shall be subject to all other statutory requirements including approval by the bureau. (c)  The final authority for entering into equipment support contracts shall rest with the bureau, and such contracts shall be executed by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services in accordance with the procedures and regulations defined by said authority. (d)  Equipment support contracts shall include the following annual appropriation dependency clause: "The continuation of this contract is contingent upon the appropriation of funds to fulfill the requirements of the contract by the Legislature.  If the Legislature fails to appropriate sufficient monies to provide for the continuance of the contract, the contract shall terminate on the date of the beginning of the first fiscal year for which funds are not appropriated." (3)  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services may on behalf of any state agency enter into contracts for the lease or purchase of telecommunications equipment systems or services in accordance with the following provisions: (a)  The bureau may directly contract for or approve contracts for regulated or tariffed telecommunications services upon determination by the bureau that the application of such service is in the best interests of the State of Mississippi. (b)  All other contracts of this type shall be entered into through a bid as defined in Section 25-53-3. (c)  The justification of such contracts must be presented to the bureau.  Such justification shall identify and consider all cost factors relevant to that contract. (d)  [Deleted] (e)  All lease contracts must contain the following annual appropriation dependency clause: "The continuation of this contract is contingent upon the appropriation of funds to fulfill the requirements of the contract by the Legislature.  If the Legislature fails to appropriate sufficient monies to provide for the continuation of a contract, the contract shall terminate on the date of the beginning of the first fiscal year for which funds are not appropriated." (f)  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall maintain a list of all such contracts.  This list shall show as a minimum the name of the vendor, the annual cost of each contract and the term of the contract or the purchase cost. SECTION 35.  Section 25-53-123, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-123.  (1)  The only method of procurement permitted for the acquisition of nonregulated telecommunications systems, including equipment and related services, shall be in conformity with Section 25-53-5. SECTION 36.  Section 25-53-125, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-125.  The following general provisions shall apply to all procurements under Sections 25-53-101 through 25-53-125: (a)  No contracts entered into hereunder shall have an initial effective date earlier than the date on which such contract receives approval as required herein. (b)  All changes, modifications and amendments to any contract hereunder shall be approved in advance by the bureau, in addition to any other approvals required by law. (c)  The bureau shall promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedures Law, Section 25-43-1.101 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972, for the establishment of contract format. (d)  Where written proposals or bids are submitted by vendors, the proposal or bid of the successful vendor shall be incorporated into the final contract consummated with that vendor. (e)  The provisions of Sections 25-53-101 through 25-53-125 shall, with respect to the procurement of telecommunications equipment, systems or related services, supersede specifications of any contradictory or conflicting provisions of Chapter 7, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972, and other laws with respect to awarding public contracts. SECTION 37.  Section 25-53-151, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-151.  (1)  There is established in the State Treasury the "Electronic Government Services Fund," into which shall be deposited specific funds appropriated by the Legislature for developing and providing electronic government services within the State of Mississippi.  Any funds in the Electronic Government Services Fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, but shall be available for expenditure in the subsequent fiscal year.  The funds in the Electronic Government Fund shall be available for expenditure pursuant to specific appropriation by the Legislature beginning in fiscal year 2002, to the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services. (2)  There is hereby established an Electronic Government Oversight Committee to oversee the implementation of E-Government and related technology initiatives.  Duties of this committee would include:  (a) prioritize and make recommendations for all electronic government services, in order to cut across state and local governmental organizational structures; (b) address policy issues such as privacy, security, transaction fees and accessibility; (c) review ongoing fiscal and operational management and support of portal; (d) provide a mechanism for gathering input from citizens, businesses and government entities; (e) encourage self-service models for citizens through state websites and other electronic services; and (f) promote economic development and efficient delivery of government services by encouraging governmental and private sector entities to conduct their business and transactions using electronic media.  The Electronic Government Oversight Committee shall be composed of the following:  (a) the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services, or his designee; (b) the State Auditor, or his designee; (c) the State Treasurer, or his designee; (d) the Secretary of State, or his designee; (e) the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration, or his designee; (f) the Commissioner of Public Safety, or his designee; (g) the Commissioner of Revenue, or his designee; (h) the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks or his designee; (i) the Executive Director of the Department of Archives and History or his/her designee.  The committee shall annually elect one (1) member to serve as chairman and one (1) member to serve as vice chairman, who shall act as chairman in the absence of the chairman.  The committee shall meet monthly or upon the call of the chairman, and shall make necessary reports and recommendations to the Legislature and the appropriate agencies of state government.  All agencies of state government shall cooperate with the committee in providing requested information, shall work closely with and provide information to the committee and shall report to the committee at its request.  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall provide administrative support for the committee.  Nonlegislative members of the committee shall serve without compensation. (3)  The Electronic Government Oversight Committee shall advise and provide direction to the Department of Finance and Administration to develop a procurement portal that will enable potential vendors of goods and services to access relevant and necessary information related to the sale of the following types of goods and services to the State of Mississippi and its agencies: (a)  Commodities, as defined by Section 31-7-1; (b)  Contract personnel, as defined by Sections 25-9-107 and 25-9-120; and (c)  Computer equipment and services, as defined by Section 25-53-3. (4)  The procurement portal provided for in subsection (3) must provide potential vendors with the following: (a)  A searchable database of business procurement opportunities with the state which includes a breakdown by product or service and by the organization seeking the product or service; (b)  Listings of the published date and closing date for each business procurement opportunity; (c)  A "Frequently Asked Questions" section regarding doing business with the respective agencies; (d)  A breakdown of "Frequently Asked Questions" regarding the selection process with the respective agencies; (e)  An open-air forum for questions and answers relating to the procurement process, in general, as well as specifically relating to a single contract; and (f)  Links to individual agency websites and contacts to enable potential vendors to obtain more specific information, if necessary. (5)  The procurement portal must be linked to the Transparency Mississippi website established in accordance with Sections 27-104-151 through 27-104-163.  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall develop and maintain a link to the procurement portal from the state website. From and after July 1, 2018, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund.  In addition, in order to receive the maximum use and benefit from information technology and services, expenses for the provision of statewide shared services that facilitate cost-effective information processing and telecommunication solutions shall be defrayed by pass-through funding and shall be deposited into the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services Revolving Fund unless otherwise specified by the Legislature.  These funds shall only be utilized to pay the actual costs incurred by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services for providing these shared services to state agencies.  Furthermore, state agencies shall work in full cooperation with the Board of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services (MDITS) to identify computer equipment or services to minimize duplication, reduce costs, and improve the efficiency of providing common technology services across agency boundaries. SECTION 38.  Section 25-53-171, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-171.  (1)  There is hereby created the Wireless Communication Commission, which shall be responsible for promoting the efficient use of public resources to ensure that law enforcement personnel and essential public health and safety personnel have effective communications services available in emergency situations, and to ensure the rapid restoration of such communications services in the event of disruption caused by natural disaster, terrorist attack or other public emergency. (2)  The Wireless Communication Commission, hereafter referred to as the "commission," shall consist of the following: (a)  The Executive Director of the Department of Transportation or his designee; (b)  The Commissioner of Public Safety or his designee; (c)  The Executive Director of the Department of Public Health or his designee; (d)  The Executive Director of the Department of Information Technology Services or his designee; (e)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency or his designee; (f)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Office of Homeland Security or his designee; (g)  The President of the Mississippi Sheriffs' Association or his designee; (h)  The President of the Mississippi Association of Supervisors or his designee; (i)  The President of the Mississippi Municipal Association or his designee; (j)  The President of the Mississippi Association of Fire Chiefs or his designee; (k)  The President of the Mississippi Association of Police Chiefs or his designee; (l)  The Chief of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol or his designee; (m)  The Commissioner of the Department of Corrections or his designee; (n)  The Adjutant General of the Mississippi National Guard or his designee; (o)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality or his designee; and (p)  The Executive Director of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks or his designee. All members of the commission shall serve a term of not less than four (4) years. (3)  Within forty-five (45) days from April 21, 2005, the Executive Director of the Department of Information Technology Services shall call a meeting of the commission in the City of Jackson, Mississippi, and organize by electing a chairman and other officers from its membership.  The commission shall adopt rules which govern the time and place for meetings and governing the manner of conducting its business.  The commission shall meet at least monthly and maintain minutes of such meetings.  A quorum shall consist of a majority of the membership of the commission. (4)  The commission, in conjunction with the Department of Information Technology Services, shall have the sole authority to promulgate rules and regulations governing the operations of the wireless communications system described in paragraph (a) and shall be vested with all legal authority necessary and proper to perform this function including, but not limited to: (a)  Purchasing, leasing, acquiring and otherwise implementing a statewide wireless communications system to serve wireless users in state and local governments and those private entities that enter into a partnership with the commission. All purchases shall be made in accordance with public purchasing laws and, if required, shall be approved by the Department of Information Technology Services.  This system shall enable interoperability between various wireless communications technologies. (b)  Ensuring that federal/state communications requirements are followed with respect to such wireless communications systems. (c)  Providing system planning with all public safety communications systems. (d)  Assisting with establishment of state and local wireless communications. (e)  In consultation with the Department of Information Technology Services, having the authority to permit state and local agencies use of the communications system under the terms and conditions established by the commission. (f)  Providing technical support to users and bearing the overall responsibility for the design, engineering, acquisition and implementation of the statewide communications system and for ensuring the proper operation and maintenance of all equipment common to the system. (g)  Seeking proposals for services through competitive processes where required by law and selecting service providers under procedures provided for by law. (h)  Establishing, in conjunction with the Department of Information Technology Services, policies, procedures and standards which shall be incorporated into a comprehensive management plan for the operation of the statewide communications system. (i)  Having sign-off approval on all wireless communications systems within the state which are owned or operated by any state or local governmental entity, agency or department. (j)  Creating a standard user agreement. (5)  The commission, in conjunction with the Department of Information Technology Services, shall exercise its powers and duties pursuant to this section to plan, manage and administer the wireless communications system.  The commission may: (a)  In consultation with the advisory board and the Department of Information Technology Services, establish policies, procedures and standards to incorporate into a comprehensive management plan for use and operation of the communications system. (b)  Enter into mutual aid agreements among federal, state and local agencies for the use of the communications system. (c)  Establish the cost of maintenance and operation of the system and charge subscribers for access and use of the system. (d)  Assess charges for use of the system. (e)  Obtain space through rent or lease of space on any tower under state control.  The commission may also rent, lease or sublease ground space as necessary to locate equipment to support antennae on the towers.  The costs for use of such space shall be established by the owner/agent for each site when it is determined to be practicable and feasible to make space available. (f)  Provide space through rent or lease of space on any tower under the commission's control. The commission may also rent, lease or sublease ground space as necessary to locate equipment to support antennae on the towers.  The costs for use of such space shall be established by the commission when it is determined to be practicable and feasible to make space available. (g)  Refuse to lease space on any tower at any site.  All monies collected by the commission for such rents, leases or subleases shall be deposited directly into a special fund hereby created and known as the "Integrated Public Safety Communications Fund."  This fund shall be administered by the Department of Information Technology Services and may be used by the commission to construct, maintain and operate the system. (h)  Rent, lease or sublease ground space on lands acquired by the commission for the construction of privately owned or publicly owned towers.  The commission, as part of such rental, lease or sublease agreement, may require space on such towers for antennae as may be necessary for the construction and operation of the wireless communications system. (i)  Enter into and perform use and occupancy agreements concerning the system. (j)  Exercise any power necessary to carry out the intent of this law. (6)  The Department of Transportation, the Department of Public Safety and other commission members may provide to the commission, on a full-time or part-time basis, personnel and technical support necessary and sufficient to effectively and efficiently carry out the requirements of this section. (7)  (a)  Expenditures from the Integrated Public Safety Communications Fund shall be administered by the Department of Information Technology Services with expenditures approved jointly by the commission and the Department of Information Technology Services. (b)  The Integrated Public Safety Communications Fund may consist of the following: (i) Appropriations from the Legislature; (ii)  Gifts; (iii)  Federal grants; (iv)  Fees and contributions from user agencies that the commission considers necessary to maintain and operate the system; and (v)  Monies from any other source permitted by law. (c)  Any monies remaining in the Integrated Public Safety Communications Fund at the end of the fiscal year shall not revert to the State General Fund, but shall remain in the Integrated Public Safety Communications Fund. (8)  Members of the commission shall not receive any compensation or per diem, but may receive travel reimbursement provided for under Section 25-3-41. (9)  There is hereby created the Wireless Communication Advisory Board for the purpose of advising the Mississippi Wireless Communication Commission in performance of its duties. The advisory board shall be composed of the following: (a)  The Chairman and Vice Chairman of the Senate Public Utilities Committee or their designees; (b)  The Chairman and Vice Chairman of the House of Representatives Public Utilities Committee or their designees; (c)  The Chairman of the Senate Appropriations Committee or his designee; (d)  The Chairman of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee or his designee; (e)  The Chairman of the Senate Finance Committee or his designee; and (f)  The Chairman of the House of Representatives Ways and Means Committee or his designee. Members of the advisory board shall receive per diem and expenses which shall be paid from the contingent expense funds of their respective houses in the same amounts as provided for committee meetings when the Legislature is not in session; however, no per diem and expenses for attending meetings of the advisory board shall be paid to legislative members while the Legislature is in session. (10)  It is the intent of the Legislature that all state and local government entities make available for purposes of this section all publicly owned wireless communications infrastructure, including, but not limited to, communications towers, transmission equipment, transmission frequencies and other related properties and facilities. (11)  Nothing in this section shall be construed or interpreted to provide for the regulation or oversight of commercial mobile radio services. (12)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede the authority of the Department of Information Technology Services provided in Section 25-53-1 et seq. (13)  From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law. (14)  From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section. SECTION 39.  Section 25-53-191, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-191.  (1)  For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed to them in this section unless the context otherwise clearly requires: (a) "Department" means the Mississippi Department of Information Technology. (b)  "State agency" means any agency, department, commission, board, bureau, institution or other instrumentality of the state. (c)  "Wireless communication device" means a cellular telephone, pager or a personal digital assistant device having wireless communication capability. (2)  Before a wireless communication device may be assigned, issued or made available to an agency officer or employee, the agency head, or his designee, shall sign a statement certifying the need or reason for issuing the device.  No officer or employee of any state agency, except for an officer or employee of the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency, shall be assigned or issued more than one (1) such wireless communication device.  No officer or employee of any state agency to whom has been assigned, issued or made available the use of a wireless communication device, the cost of which is paid through the use of public funds, shall use such device for personal use. (3)  A state agency shall not reimburse any officer or employee for use of his or her personal wireless communication device. (4)  Every state agency that, at the expense of the state agency, assigns, issues or makes available to any of its officers or employees a wireless communication device shall obtain and maintain detailed billing for every wireless communication device account. A list of approved vendors for the procurement of wireless communication devices and the delivery of wireless communication device services shall be developed for all state agencies by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services.  The department shall exercise the option of selecting one (1) vendor from which to procure wireless communication devices and to provide wireless communication device services, or if it deems such to be most advantageous to the state agencies, it may select multiple vendors.  The department shall select a vendor or vendors on the basis of lowest and best bid proposals.  A state agency may not procure a wireless communication device from any vendor or contract for wireless communication device services with any vendor unless the vendor appears on the list approved by the department.  A contract entered into in violation of this section shall be void and unenforceable. (5)  The department shall promulgate a model acceptable use policy defining the appropriate use of all wireless communication devices.  The department shall include in its definition of appropriate use a prohibition on the downloading, accessing, or using of a prohibited technology pursuant to the National Security on State Devices and Networks Act.  The acceptable use policy should specify that these resources, including both devices and services, are provided at the state agency's expense as tools for accomplishing the business missions of the state agency; that all those resources are for business use; and that more than incidental personal use of those resources is prohibited.  The acceptable use policy should require that each official and employee issued one (1) of the above devices or authorized to access one (1) of the above services sign the policy and that the signed copy be placed in the personnel file of the official or employee.  The acceptable use policy should also require that the use of these resources be tracked, verified and signed by the official or employee and the supervisor of the official or employee at each billing cycle or other appropriate interval. All state agencies shall adopt the model policy or adopt a policy that is, at minimum, as stringent as the model policy and shall provide a copy of the policy to the department. (6)  All state agencies shall purchase or acquire only the lowest cost cellular telephone, pager or personal digital assistance device which will carry out its intended use. (7)  The University of Mississippi Medical Center and its employees, the Mississippi State University Extension Service and its agents and faculty members, the Mississippi State University Agricultural and Forestry Experiment Station and its faculty members, the Mississippi State University Forestry and Wildlife Research Center and its faculty members, and the Mississippi State University College of Veterinary Medicine and its faculty members shall be exempt from the application of this section. (8)  Employees of State Institutions of Higher Learning shall be exempt from the provisions of this section when incurring international usage charges for the business-related use of their personal wireless communication devices during business-related international travel.  Such exemption shall only apply after a determination by the employer-institution that reimbursement to the employee for the use of his or her personal wireless communication device is the lowest-cost option to prevent business interruption during such travel. (9)  The State Auditor shall conduct necessary audits to ensure compliance with the provisions of this section. SECTION 40.  Section 25-53-193, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-193.  (1)  This section shall be known and may be cited as the "National Security on State Devices and Networks Act." (2)  For the purposes of this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Prohibited technology" means any information technology deemed to pose an unacceptable risk to the security of the United States and/or the State of Mississippi by Mississippi and/or federal law, regulation, or guidance. (b)  "State-issued devices" means any desktop computer, laptop computer, cell phone, tablet or any other device capable of internet connectivity that is issued to a state employee pursuant to his or her employment and for use in carrying out his or her professional duties. (c)  "State-operated networks" means any telecommunications network, including, but not limited to, wireless local area networks, wireless guest networks, virtual private networks, or other information technology network systems owned or operated by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services or any other state agency. (d)  "State agency" means any agency, department, commission, board, bureau, institution or other instrumentality of the state. (e)  "State employee" means an employee or agent complying with and performing duties on behalf of the state. (3)  No state employee shall download, access, or use a prohibited technology on a state-issued device or a state-operated network. (4)  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services, or any other appropriate state agency, shall restrict the download, access or use of prohibited technologies on state-operated networks.  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall maintain and timely update a publicly available list of such prohibited technologies on its website. (5)  The provisions of this section shall not apply to law enforcement agencies of the state or its political subdivisions when downloading, accessing, or using a prohibited technology is necessary to carry out their official duties for bona fide law enforcement, investigative or public safety purposes. SECTION 41.  Section 25-53-201, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-201.  (1) There is hereby established the Enterprise Security Program which shall provide for the coordinated oversight of the cybersecurity efforts across all state agencies, including cybersecurity systems, services and the development of policies, standards and guidelines. (2)  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services (MDITS), in conjunction with all state agencies, shall provide centralized management and coordination of state policies for the security of data and information technology resources, which such information shall be compiled by MDITS and distributed to each participating state agency.  MDITS shall: (a)  Serve as sole authority, within the constraints of this statute, for defining the specific enterprise cybersecurity systems and services to which this statute is applicable; (b)  Acquire and operate enterprise technology solutions to provide services to state agencies when it is determined that such operation will improve the cybersecurity posture in the function of any agency, institution or function of state government as a whole; (c)  Provide oversight of enterprise security policies for state data and information technology (IT) resources including, the following: (i) Establishing and maintaining the security standards and policies for all state data and IT resources state agencies shall implement to the extent that they apply; and (ii) Including the defined enterprise security requirements as minimum requirements in the specifications for solicitation of state contracts for procuring data and information technology systems and services; (d)  Adhere to all policies, standards and guidelines in the management of technology infrastructure supporting the state data centers, telecommunications networks and backup facilities; (e) Coordinate and promote efficiency and security with all applicable laws and regulations in the acquisition, operation and maintenance of state data, cybersecurity systems and services used by agencies of the state; (f)  Manage, plan and coordinate all enterprise cybersecurity systems under the jurisdiction of the state; (g)  Develop, in conjunction with agencies of the state, coordinated enterprise cybersecurity systems and services for all state agencies; (h)  Provide ongoing analysis of enterprise cybersecurity systems and services costs, facilities and systems within state government; (i)  Develop policies, procedures and long-range plans for the use of enterprise cybersecurity systems and services; (j)  Form an advisory council of information security officers from each state agency to plan, develop and implement cybersecurity initiatives; (k) Coordinate the activities of the advisory council to provide education and awareness, identify cybersecurity-related issues, set future direction for cybersecurity plans and policy, and provide a forum for interagency communications regarding cybersecurity; (l)  Charge respective user agencies on a reimbursement basis for their proportionate cost of the installation, maintenance and operation of the cybersecurity systems and services; and (m)  Require cooperative utilization of cybersecurity systems and services by aggregating users. (3)  Each state agency's executive director or agency head shall: (a)  Be solely responsible for the security of all data and IT resources under its purview, irrespective of the location of the data or resources.  Locations include data residing: (i)  At agency sites; (ii)  On agency real property and tangible and intangible assets; (iii)  On infrastructure in the State Data Centers; (iv)  At a third-party location; (v)  In transit between locations; (b)  Ensure that an agency-wide security program is in place; (c) Designate an information security officer to administer the agency's security program; (d)  Ensure the agency adheres to the requirements established by the Enterprise Security Program, to the extent that they apply; (e) Participate in all Enterprise Security Program initiatives and services in lieu of deploying duplicate services specific to the agency; (f)  Develop, implement and maintain written agency policies and procedures to ensure the security of data and IT resources.  The agency policies and procedures are confidential information and exempt from public inspection, except that the information must be available to the Office of the State Auditor in performing auditing duties; (g) Implement policies and standards to ensure that all of the agency's data and IT resources are maintained in compliance with state and federal laws and regulations, to the extent that they apply; (h) Implement appropriate cost-effective safeguards to reduce, eliminate or recover from identified threats to data and IT resources; (i)  Ensure that internal assessments of the security program are conducted.  The results of the internal assessments are confidential and exempt from public inspection, except that the information must be available to the Office of the State Auditor in performing auditing duties; (j)  Include all appropriate cybersecurity requirements in the specifications for the agency's solicitation of state contracts for procuring data and information technology systems and services; (k)  Include a general description of the security program and future plans for ensuring security of data in the agency long-range information technology plan; (l) Participate in annual information security training designed specifically for the executive director or agency head to ensure that such individual has an understanding of: (i)  The information and information systems that support the operations and assets of the agency; (ii)  The potential impact of common types of cyber-attacks and data breaches on the agency's operations and assets; (iii) How cyber-attacks and data breaches on the agency's operations and assets could impact the operations and assets of other state agencies on the Enterprise State Network; (iv)  How cyber-attacks and data breaches occur; (v) Steps to be undertaken by the executive director or agency head and agency employees to protect their information and information systems; and (vi)  The annual reporting requirements required of the executive director or agency head. (4)  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall evaluate the Enterprise Security Program.  Such evaluation shall include the following factors: (a)  Whether the Enterprise Security Program incorporates nationwide best practices; (b)  Whether opportunities exist to centralize and coordinate oversight of cybersecurity efforts across all state agencies; (c)  A review of the minimum enterprise security requirements that must be incorporated in solicitations for state contracts for procuring data and information technology systems and services; and (d)  Whether opportunities exist to expand the Enterprise Security Program, including providing oversight of cybersecurity efforts of those governing authorities as defined in Section 25-53-3(e). In performing such evaluation, the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services may retain experts.  This evaluation shall be completed by November 1, 2023.  All records in connection with this evaluation shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983, pursuant to Section 25-61-11.2(f) and (k). (5)  For the purpose of this subsection, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a) "Cyberattack" shall mean any attempt to gain illegal access, including any data breach, to a computer, computer system or computer network for purposes of causing damage, disruption or harm. (b) "Ransomware" shall mean a computer contaminant or lock placed or introduced without authorization into a computer, computer system or computer network that restricts access by an authorized person to the computer, computer system, computer network or any data therein under circumstances in which the person responsible for the placement or introduction of the ransomware demands payment of money or other consideration to remove the computer contaminant, restore access to the computer, computer system, computer network or data, or otherwise remediate the impact of the computer contaminant or lock. (c)  From and after July 1, 2023, all state agencies shall notify the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services of any cyberattack or demand for payment as a result of ransomware no later than the close of the next business day following the discovery of such cyberattack or demand.  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall develop a reporting format to be utilized by state agencies to provide such notification.  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall periodically analyze all such reports and attempt to identify any patterns or weaknesses in the state's cybersecurity efforts.  Such reports shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983, pursuant to Section 25-61-11.2(j). SECTION 42.  Section 25-53-231, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-231.  There is hereby created the "Cyber Security Review Board," which shall be responsible for ensuring a collaborative effort is made to address the cybersecurity threat posed to the State of Mississippi.  Responsibilities of the board include creating a system of reporting cybersecurity attacks within the state, researching and implementing best practices to mitigate cybersecurity risks, and connecting individuals and entities with federal and industry partners. SECTION 43.  Section 25-53-233, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-233.  The Cyber Security Review Board, hereafter referred to as the "board," shall consist of the following seven (7) members: (a)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Office of Homeland Security, or his or her designee, as chairman of the board; (b)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services, or his or her designee, as vice chairman of the board; (c)  The Commissioner of the Department of Public Safety, or his or her designee; (d)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency, or his or her designee; (e)  The Adjutant General of the Mississippi National Guard, or his or her designee; (f)  The State Superintendent of Education, as appointed by the Mississippi Board of Education, or his or her designee; and (g)  The Attorney General of Mississippi, or his or her designee. SECTION 44.  Section 25-53-235, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-235.  (1)  Ex officio nonvoting members of the board include: (a)  The President of the Mississippi Municipal League, or his or her designee; (b)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Association of Supervisors staff, or his or her designee; and (c)  The Chairmen of the Technology Committees of the Mississippi Senate and the Mississippi House of Representatives, or their designees. (2)  The voting members of the Cyber Security Review Board may vote to expand the board with additional ex officio nonvoting members deemed necessary to provide expertise or access to resources involving cybersecurity. SECTION 45.  Section 25-53-237, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-237.  Within forty-five (45) days of April 8, 2024, the Executive Director of the Mississippi Office of Homeland Security shall call a meeting of the board.  The board shall adopt rules which govern the time of meetings, place of meetings, and the manner of conducting the business of the board.  The board shall meet at least monthly and select one (1) of the ex officio nonvoting members of the board to serve as secretary, whose role it shall be to maintain minutes of each meeting of the board.  After the conclusion of each meeting, the board shall send the minutes of the meeting to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor and the Chairmen of the Technology Committees of the Mississippi Senate and the Mississippi House of Representatives. A quorum shall be a majority of the voting members of the board. After twelve (12) consecutive monthly meetings, the board may vote to meet less frequently; however, the board shall meet at least once quarterly. SECTION 46.  Section 25-53-239, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-239.  The board shall produce a statewide cybersecurity report, which shall be presented to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Speaker of the House, and the Chairmen of the Technology Committees of the Mississippi Senate and Mississippi House of Representatives by December 15 each year.  The board shall also develop a list of best practices in cybersecurity to disburse throughout the state to various parties as deemed necessary by the board. SECTION 47.  Section 25-53-241, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-241.  (1)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the "Cyber Security Review Board Fund."  Any funds which may be needed for administrative and travel expenses shall be deposited in this special fund by the Department of Public Safety from the department's regular support appropriation.  The Cyber Security Review Board Fund is a special trust fund, and the interest earned thereon shall be credited to the fund. (2)  The Department of Public Safety shall adopt regulations for the administration of the fund.  The commissioner shall administer the fund, and expenditures may be made from the fund upon requisition by the commissioner.  The department shall spend monies in the fund by an annual appropriation approved by the Legislature. SECTION 48.  Section 25-53-251, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-251.  Sections 25-53-251 through 25-53-263 shall be known and may be cited as the "Cloud Center of Excellence Act." SECTION 49.  Section 25-53-253, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-253.  As used in Sections 25-53-251 through 25-53-263, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed herein, unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "Cloud Center of Excellence" or "CCOE" means the centralized body responsible for providing strategic guidance, best practices, governance, and technical support for cloud adoption and management across state agencies and governing authorities. (b)  "Cloud computing" means on-demand access to computing resources, including storage, servers, and applications, delivered via the Internet or other networks. (c)  "ITS" or "department" means the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services. (d)  "Governing authority" means the same as the term governing authority is defined in Section 25-53-3(2)(f). (e)  "State agency" means the same as the term "agency" is defined in Section 25-53-3(2)(e). SECTION 50.  Section 25-53-255, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-255.  (1)  There is established within the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services (ITS) a centralized Cloud Center of Excellence (CCOE) to facilitate cloud adoption across state agencies and governing authorities, enhance technological infrastructure, improve security and scalability, and streamline cloud migrations in a cost-effective and efficient manner. (2)  Using existing resources, ITS may review the process for the coordinated development, hosting and management of computer software for state agencies that use cloud computing services.  The Cloud Center of Excellence (CCOE) shall: (a)  Develop and implement a statewide strategy for cloud adoption and management; (b)  Provide guidance, best practices, and governance frameworks to state agencies and governing authorities for the adoption and use of cloud services; (c)  Establish standardized processes for cloud migrations, resource optimization, and workload assessments; (d)  Enhance cybersecurity protocols and ensure compliance with state and federal security standards; (e)  Monitor and report on the scalability, cost efficiency, and performance of cloud infrastructure; (f)  Offer training and support to agency personnel to promote cloud literacy and effective utilization; and (g)  Coordinate with state agencies and governing authorities to ensure a phased implementation schedule as required by the provision of Section 25-53-257. SECTION 51.  Section 25-53-257, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-257.  (1)  The Cloud Center of Excellence (CCOE) shall establish a two-year phased implementation plan, which shall accomplish the following benchmarks by July 1, 2027: (a)  Conduct statewide readiness assessments and develop detailed cloud migration plans for pilot agencies; (b)  Initiate pilot migrations for selected state agencies, establish key performance indicators (KPIs) and refine processes based on feedback; (c)  Expand cloud adoption to additional state agencies, focusing on optimizing resource utilization and ensuring adherence to best practices; (d)  Integrate governing authorities into the cloud ecosystem and provide support for local governments, postsecondary educational institutions and school districts; and (e)  Achieve full statewide adoption of cloud services, with ongoing monitoring, training, and optimization provided by the CCOE for all state agencies and governing authorities. (2)  During the implementation described in subsection (1), each state agency and governing authority integrated into the CCOE at that time shall consider: (a)  Cloud computing service options, including any security benefits and cost savings associated with purchasing those service options from a cloud computing service provider and from a statewide technology center established by the department, when making purchases; and (b)  Cloud computing service options and compatibility with cloud computing services in the development of new information technology software applications. (3)  (a)  Except as provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection, a state agency or governing authority shall ensure, when making purchases for an automated information system, that the system is capable of being deployed and run on cloud computing services. (b)  When making a purchase for an automated information system, a state agency or governing authority may determine that, due to integration limitations with legacy systems, security risks or costs, the state agency or governing authority is unable to purchase a system capable of being deployed and run on cloud computing services. (c)  At least fourteen (14) days before the date a state agency or governing authority solicits bids, proposals, offers or other applicable expressions of interest for a purchase described by paragraph (b) of this subsection, the state agency or governing authority shall submit a report that describes the purchase and the agency's reasoning for making the purchase of an automated information system to the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services (ITS). (4)  The department shall provide administrative support and oversight to the CCOE and ensure compliance with Sections 25-53-251 through 25-53-263. (5)  The department is authorized to: (a)  Enter into agreements with cloud service providers to facilitate cost-effective procurement of cloud solutions; (b)  Develop and enforce statewide cloud security and compliance standards; (c)  Establish funding mechanisms, including interagency agreements, to support the operations of the CCOE; and (d)  Promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of Sections 25-53-251 through 25-53-263. SECTION 52.  Section 25-53-259, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-53-259.  (1)  Not later than November 15 of each even-numbered year, ITS, using existing resources, shall submit a report to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor and Speaker, the Chairpersons of the House and Senate Committees on Technology and of the House State Affairs Committee on the use of cloud computing service options by state agencies and governing authorities,  detailing the progress of the implementation plan, challenges encountered, and recommendations for improvement.  The report must include * * *use cases that provided cost savings and other benefits, including security enhancements.  All state agencies and governing authorities shall cooperate with ITS in the creation of the report by providing timely and accurate information and any assistance required by the department. SECTION 53.  Section 25-53-261, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-261.  The Legislature shall appropriate funds to the Department of Information Technology Services to implement and operate the Cloud Center of Excellence (CCOE).  The CCOE may seek additional funding through federal grants, partnerships, and other available resources. SECTION 54.  Section 25-53-263, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-263.  (1)  The purpose of Sections 25-53-251 through 25-53-263 is to establish a Technology Innovation Fund, hereafter referred to as "Fund," to facilitate the development and deployment of innovative technological solutions that enhance the efficiency, transparency and responsiveness of government services.  The fund is intended to support collaborative efforts between government agencies, educational institutions, private sector partners and nonprofit organizations in the implementation of digital solutions that drive public sector modernization. (2)  (a)  There is hereby established the Technology Innovation Fund, which shall be administered by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services (ITS) under the authority of the Chief Information Officer (CIO) of the State of Mississippi. (b)  The fund shall provide financial support for projects that utilize technology to address critical needs, improve service delivery, and foster collaboration between public and private entities. (3)  The objectives of the fund shall include, but are not limited to, the following: (a)  Promote the development of digital solutions that improve government service delivery and operational efficiency; (b)  Foster cross-agency and intergovernmental collaboration in the adoption of shared technologies and best practices; (c)  Encourage public-private partnerships in the development and deployment of innovative technologies; (d)  Facilitate research, prototyping, and piloting of emerging technologies such as artificial intelligence, blockchain, data analytics, and cloud computing; (e)  Ensure equitable access to technological innovations that can benefit underserved communities and regions; and (f)  Enhance cybersecurity and protect the integrity of state digital infrastructure. (4)  (a)  The following entities shall be eligible to apply for funding under Sections 25-53-251 through 25-53-263: (i)  State and local government agencies; (ii)  Public and private educational institutions; (iii)  Nonprofit organizations engaged in technology-driven public service initiatives; and (iv)  Private sector entities, in partnership with public sector agencies, for collaborative projects. (b)  Applications for funding must demonstrate how the proposed project will contribute to the digital transformation of government services and the achievement of the objectives outlined in Section 25-53-255. (5)  (a)  The CIO of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall establish criteria for the evaluation of proposals and the allocation of funds, prioritizing projects that: (i)  Provide measurable benefits to the public and improve government operations; (ii)  Demonstrate potential for scalability and sustainability; (iii)  Foster partnerships across government, private, and nonprofit sectors; and (iv)  Address urgent challenges in service delivery, efficiency, and cybersecurity. (b)  The fund may allocate grants, matching funds, or loans to eligible projects, as deemed appropriate by the CIO. (6)  (a)  Each recipient of funding from the Technology Innovation Fund shall be required to provide periodic reports to the CIO detailing the progress, outcomes, and financial expenditures associated with the funded project. (b)  The CIO shall submit an annual report to the Governor and Legislature detailing the use of the Technology Innovation Fund, including descriptions of funded projects, their outcomes, and recommendations for future innovations. (7)  (a)  The fund shall be initially capitalized with an appropriation of monies from the General Fund, with additional funding to be secured from: (i)  Public-private partnerships; (ii)  Federal grants or matching programs; (iii)  Revenues from technological licensing or commercialization resulting from funded projects; and (iv)  Donations or contributions from private or philanthropic organizations. (b)  The fund may also establish a revolving loan mechanism to replenish available resources through repayments from successful projects. (8)  The CIO of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services (ITS) is authorized to promulgate any rules and regulations necessary for the implementation and administration of Sections 25-53-251 through 25-53-263. SECTION 55.  Section 25-53-281, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-281.  (1)  This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi Statewide Data Exchange Act." (2)  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services (ITS) is tasked with conducting a comprehensive study to assess the feasibility, operational requirements and policy considerations for the implementation of a statewide data exchange initiative.  This initiative shall support secure, efficient and standardized data sharing among Mississippi state agencies and other authorized entities to support enhanced digital government services. (3)  Based on the findings of the study, ITS shall develop and oversee the phased implementation of a cloud-based statewide data exchange platform that enables agencies to share relevant data in a structured and compliant manner.  The platform shall be designed to: (a)  Facilitate secure and efficient data sharing among state agencies and other authorized entities, while ensuring appropriate access controls and data privacy safeguards; (b)  Enable a centralized data repository and interoperability framework, allowing agencies to cross-reference and validate existing state-provided programs to improve service delivery, reduce redundancy and enhance decision-making processes; and (c)  Implement data governance and security best practices in alignment with state and federal laws and regulations to safeguard sensitive and confidential information. (4)  To ensure ongoing oversight, coordination and strategic guidance for the data exchange initiative, ITS shall establish a Chief Information Officer (CIO) Council, composed of information and technology leadership from state agencies.  The CIO Council shall: (a)  Provide recommendations on technical standards, interoperability frameworks and cybersecurity protocols; (b)  Facilitate interagency collaboration to maximize data-sharing efficiencies and promote best practices; (c)  Ensure that the statewide data exchange aligns with agency-specific and statewide strategic goals developed to enhance digital government services; and (d)  Serve as an advisory body to ITS in evaluating the long-term sustainability and innovation potential of the platform. (5)  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations necessary to design, develop, implement, monitor and update the statewide data exchange platform, associated governance policies and interagency coordination efforts for enhanced digital government services. (6)  To ensure the effective execution of the Mississippi Statewide Data Exchange Act, the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services (MDITS) shall adhere to the following timeline for key deliverables: (a)  By October 1, 2025, MDITS shall establish the CIO Council and the governance framework related thereto. (b)  Within six (6) months of the first meeting of the CIO Council, the council shall conduct a feasibility study regarding the requirements of the Mississippi Statewide Data Exchange Act, and recommendations from the findings of the study shall be reported to the legislature. (c)  Within six (6) months of reporting the findings from the feasibility study to the legislature, the CIO Council shall develop a phased implementation plan for the Mississippi Statewide Data Exchange. (d)  Within one (1) year of approving the phased implementation plan, MDITS and the CIO Council shall launch the initial pilot program of the Mississippi Statewide Data Exchange. (e)  Within one (1) year of successfully launching the pilot program of the Mississippi Statewide Data Exchange, MDITS and the CIO Council shall implement a full statewide rollout of the data exchange program. (f)  After full implementation of the data exchange program, the CIO Council shall submit annual reports to the legislature regarding the status of the data exchange program, continuous system enhancements made to the program and any additional information necessary to develop enhanced digital government experiences via the Mississippi Statewide Data Exchange. SECTION 56.  Section 25-53-301, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-301.  (1)  The Legislature finds that: (a)  The State of Mississippi needs to support stakeholders as they gather information and decide the best means to utilize and oversee artificial intelligence (AI) tools and systems used by the State of Mississippi's governing bodies; (b)  The Legislature acknowledges that artificial intelligence cannot replace human creativity and involvement and so promotes responsibly using AI tools and systems while aligning and adhering to the states long term policies, goals, values and missions while maintaining citizen trust and balancing the benefits, risks and potential dangers of artificial intelligence; and (c)  As the use of artificial intelligence has implications for state, national and personal security and privacy, the use of artificial intelligence must be conducted in a responsible, ethical, transparent and beneficial manner. (2)  There is hereby established the Artificial Intelligence Regulation (Air) Task Force. (3)(a)The task force shall consist of the following seven (7) voting members: (i)  The Lieutenant Governor and Speaker of the House shall each appoint one (1) respective member of the Mississippi Senate and the Mississippi House of Representatives to serve as co-chairs of the task force; (ii)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services, or his or her designee; (iii)  The Director of the Mississippi Artificial Intelligence Network (MAIN), or his or her designee; (iv)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Office of Homeland Security, or his or her designee; (v)  The Adjutant General of the Mississippi National Guard, or his or her designee; and (vi)  The Attorney General of Mississippi, or his or her designee. (b)  The Chairpersons of the Artificial Intelligence Regulation (AIR) Task Force, with the advice and consent of the remaining official executive agency committee members specified in paragraph (a), or their respective designees, may appoint ex-officio nonvoting members to the task force to serve in an advisory capacity for such terms to be determined at the discretion of the task force.  The voting members of the task force, upon a majority of its membership, present and voting, and spread upon its minutes, may reduce or expand the number of ex-officio members who may serve, provided that such members are deemed necessary to provide expertise or access to resources involving AI technology and are representative of: (i)  Workforce development, who possesses expert knowledge of and experience with AI technology; (ii)  Elementary and secondary education, public or private, who possesses expert knowledge of and experience with AI technology; (iii)  Four-year postsecondary education, public or private, who possesses expert knowledge of and experience with AI technology; (iv)  Two-year postsecondary education, public or proprietary, who possesses expert knowledge of and experience with AI technology; (v)  Healthcare, who possesses expert knowledge of and experience with AI technology; (vi)  Private business entity, who possesses expert knowledge of and experience with AI technology, including, but not limited to: 1.  Data storage and management; 2.  Cloud computing infrastructure; 3.  Computer power provided by graphic processing units, tensor processing units and quantum computing; 4.  Data processing and preparation through data cleaning, data integration and ETL (extract, transform and load) process; 5.  AI algorithms and frameworks; 6.  AI software and applications; 7.  Data security and privacy; 8.  AI governance and ethical frameworks; 9. Integration with business processes; 10.  Training and talent development; and (vii)  Automation and manufacturing; (viii)  Ethics and transparency; (ix)  Agriculture; and (x)  Entertainment. (4)  The Legislative members named by the Lieutenant Governor and Speaker of the House of Representatives shall serve as co-chairs of the AIR Task Force.  The task force must meet within fifteen (15) days of the effective date of this act upon the call of the co-chairs, and at its first meeting shall elect any officers from among its members as it deems necessary for the efficient discharge of the task force's duties. (5)  The task force shall adopt rules and regulations governing times and places for meetings and governing the manner of conducting its business.  A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting any business of the task force, and a majority vote of all members present shall be required for any recommendations to the Legislature. (6)  The task force shall be responsible for balancing innovation and public interest while endeavoring to mitigate risks and unintended consequences of AI and its regulation.  The task force shall: (a)  Facilitate and evaluate through comprehensive review, develop tentative drafts of any necessary proposed revisions to the Mississippi Code involving the regulation of AI technologies, which may or may not include the following: (i)  Fostering innovation by providing an environment for businesses and organizations to develop and test AI systems under relaxed regulatory constraints; (ii)  Regulatory oversight of the designing, testing and refinement of regulations to ensure responsible AI deployment; (iii) Collaborating with stakeholders to bridge communication and idea exchanges between developers, policymakers and the public to align AI innovation with ethical and societal goals; and (iv)  Any other areas as deemed necessary by the task force. (b)  Review laws, policies and procedures concerning the use of AI technology established by the United States Congress and other state legislatures, if any, and compile a list of recommendations to include in the report required by this act.  The review shall focus on, but not be limited to focusing on: (i)  Privacy and data protection; (ii)  Development for a framework for AI testing; (iii)  Compliance with ethical standards which enforce adherence to fairness, accountability, transparency, disclosures and promoting equitable outcomes; (iv)  Assessment of risk and benefits which measures the societal and economic impact of AI innovations; (v)  Liability; (vi)  Constituent and consumer impact; (vii)  Bias and social impact; and (viii)  Copyright and provenance. (c)  Consider implementation and use of artificial intelligence in state government agencies and compile a list of recommendations of best practices and potential uses for AI technologies in government to include in the report required by this act; (d)  Consider ways to allocate funding for development and use of artificial intelligence technologies in the state and draft proposals accordingly to include in the report required by this act; and (e)  Any other issues related to artificial intelligence technologies that the task force finds appropriate to address. (7)  Members of the task force shall receive a per diem in the amount provided in Section 25-3-69 for each day engaged in the business of the task force. Members of the task force other than the legislative members shall receive reimbursement for travel expenses incurred while engaged in official business of the task force in accordance with Section 25-3-41, and the legislative members of the task force shall receive the expense allowance provided for in Section 5-1-47. (8)  The Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review shall provide necessary clerical support for the meetings of the task force and the preparation of the report, with assistance from the clerical and legal staff of the Mississippi House of Representatives and the Mississippi Senate. (9)  The task force is authorized to apply for and accept gifts, grants, subsidies and other funds from persons, corporations, foundations, the United States government or other entities, and the receipt of any gifts, grants, subsidies or funds shall be reported and otherwise accounted for in the manner provided by law. If financial subsidies are sufficient, the task force may hire additional contract staff to support its work. (10)  The term "artificial intelligence" has the meaning set forth in 15 USC § 9401(3):  a machine-based system that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing real or virtual environments.  Artificial intelligence systems use machine- and human-based inputs to perceive real and virtual environments; abstract such perceptions into models through analysis in an automated manner; and use model inference to formulate options for information or action. (11)  The task force may request the assistance of the Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review, the legal staffs of the Mississippi House of Representatives and the Mississippi Senate, or any other related organization with expertise in domestic relations. (12)  The work of the task force described in this act relates to sensitive matters of security. Notwithstanding any other law, the meetings, work and findings of the commission as described in this act are not subject to the requirements of Chapters 41 or 61 of Title 25, Mississippi Code of 1972. (13)  The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to the Legislature annually not later than December 1 each year, and shall dissolve in December 31, 2027. SECTION 57.  Section 25-58-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-58-21.  (1)  There is established the Mississippi Coordinating Council for Remote Sensing and Geographic Information Systems, hereinafter referred to as the "council."  The council shall set and assure enforcement of policies and standards to make it easier for remote sensing and geographic information system users around the state to share information and to facilitate cost-sharing arrangements to reduce the costs of acquiring remote sensing and geographic information system data.  The council shall not oversee or regulate the activities of higher education entities where it relates to the fields of teaching or research; however, the council shall be informed of these activities for the purpose of coordinating these higher education activities with other public remote sensing and GIS initiatives to achieve the maximum benefit for the State of Mississippi and its taxpayers.  The council's responsibilities include, but are not limited to: (a)  Coordination of remote sensing and geographic information system activities within Mississippi; (b)  Establishing policies and standards to guide Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services (MDITS) in the review and approval of state and local government procurement of both hardware and software development relating to remote sensing and geographic information systems; (c)  Oversight of MDITS' implementation of these responsibilities; (d)  Preparing a plan, with proposed state funding priorities, for Mississippi's remote sensing and geographic information system activities, including development, operation and maintenance of the Mississippi Digital Earth Model; (e)  Oversight of the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality's development and maintenance of the Mississippi Digital Earth Model, including establishing policies and standards for the procurement of remote sensing and geographic information system data by state and local governmental entities and establishing the order in which the seven (7) core data layers shall be developed; (f)  Designating Mississippi's official representative to the National States Geographic Information Council and to any other national or regional remote sensing or geographical information system organizations on which Mississippi has an official seat; (g)  Establishing and designating the members of an advisory committee made up of policy level officials from major state, local, regional and federal agencies, including, but not limited to, the National Association of Space Administration, the Mississippi Institute for Forestry Inventory, the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, the Mississippi Public Utilities Staff, the Department of Marine Resources, the county E911 coordinator, the State Health Officer, the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce, the * * * State Tax Commission Department of Revenue, the Council of Consulting Engineers and the Mississippi Band of Choctaw Indians, as well as members of the private sector; (h)  Creating a staff level technical users committee, in which any public or private sector entity in Mississippi interested in remote sensing and geographic information may be allowed to participate; (i)  Coordinating with the * * * State Tax Commission Department of Revenue to assure that state and local governmental entities do not have to comply with two (2) sets of requirements imposed by different organizations. (2)  The Mississippi Coordinating Council for Remote Sensing and Geographic Information Systems will be composed of the following members: (a)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality; (b)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services; (c)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Transportation; (d)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency; (e)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Development Authority; (f)  The Secretary of State; (g)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Forestry Commission; (h)  The Director of the Mississippi State Board of Registered Professional Geologists; (i)  A representative from the Institutions of Higher Learning, appointed by the Commissioner of the Institutions of Higher Learning; (j)  One (1) mayor, serving a municipality, appointed by the Executive Director of the Mississippi Municipal League; (k)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Municipal League or his designee who will serve as the member; (l)  One (1) county supervisor appointed by the Executive Director of the Mississippi Association of Supervisors; (m)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Association of Supervisors or his designee who will serve as the member; (n)  A member of the Tax Assessors/Collectors Association or the executive director of the association, to be appointed by the president of that association; (o)  A representative of the Planning and Development Districts, appointed by the Governor; (p)  A Senator, as a nonvoting member, appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (q)  A Representative, as a nonvoting member, appointed  by the Speaker of the House; (r)  A county surveyor who is a member of the Mississippi Association of Professional Surveyors, appointed by the president of the association; and The members listed in paragraphs (a) through (g) may appoint a designee, but the designee must be the head of an office, bureau, division or branch within the member's agency. The members of the council shall serve for a term concurrent with their service as an elected or appointed official or concurrent with the term of the appointing official. The Executive Director of the Department of Environmental Quality shall serve as council chair and the Executive Director of Information Technology Services as vice chair for the first two (2) years.  After the first two (2) years, the council shall elect from its members a chair and vice chair, for terms to be specified by the council. With regard to the designee chosen by the Executive Director of the Mississippi Municipal League or the Executive Director of the Mississippi Association of Supervisors, the designee shall become a permanent member of the council for a term concurrent with the term of the appointing executive director. (3)  At the direction of the chairman of the council and contingent upon the availability of sufficient funds, each member may receive reimbursement for reasonable expenses, including travel expenses in accordance with rates established pursuant to Section 25-3-41, incurred in attending meetings of the council.  Any member of the council who is also a state employee may not receive per diem compensation for attending meetings of the study committee, but may be reimbursed in accordance with Section 25-3-41 for mileage and actual expenses incurred in the performance of the duties, if authorized by vote, at a meeting of the council, which action must be recorded in the official minutes of the meeting. Legislative members of the council will be paid from the contingent expense funds of their respective houses in the same amounts as provided for committee meetings when the Legislature is not in session. (4)  The council may accept money from any source, public or private, to be expended in implementing the duties under this section. (5)  The council may utilize staff employed by the agencies affected by this section and any other assistance made available to it. SECTION 58.  Section 27-7-83, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-7-83.  (1)  Returns and return information filed or furnished under the provisions of this chapter shall be confidential, and except in accordance with proper judicial order, as otherwise authorized by this section, as authorized in Section 27-4-3 or as authorized under Section 27-7-821, it shall be unlawful for the Commissioner of Revenue or any deputy, agent, clerk or other officer or employee of the Department of Revenue or the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services, or any former employee thereof, to divulge or make known in any manner the amount of income or any particulars set forth or disclosed in any report or return required.  The provisions of this section shall apply fully to any federal return, a copy of any portion of a federal return, or any information reflected on a federal return which is attached to or made a part of the state tax return.  Likewise, the provisions of this section shall apply to any federal return or portion thereof, or to any federal return information data which is acquired from the Internal Revenue Service for state tax administration purposes pursuant to the Federal-State Exchange Program cited at Section 6103, Federal Internal Revenue Code.  The term "proper judicial order" as used in this section shall not include subpoenas or subpoenas duces tecum, but shall include only those orders entered by a court of record in this state after furnishing notice and a hearing to the taxpayer and the Department of Revenue.  The court shall not authorize the furnishing of such information unless it is satisfied that the information is needed to pursue pending litigation wherein the return itself is in issue, or the judge is satisfied that the need for furnishing the information outweighs the rights of the taxpayer to have such information secreted. (2)  Returns and return information with respect to taxes imposed by this chapter shall be open to inspection by or disclosure to the Commissioner of the Internal Revenue Service of the United States, or the proper officer of any state imposing an income tax similar to that imposed by this chapter, or the authorized representatives of such agencies.  Such inspection shall be permitted, or such disclosure made, only upon written request by the head of such agencies, or the district director in the case of the Internal Revenue Service, and only to the representatives of such agencies designated in a written statement to the Commissioner of Revenue as the individuals who are to inspect or to receive the return or return information on behalf of such agency.  The Commissioner of Revenue is authorized to enter into agreements with the Internal Revenue Service and with other states for the exchange of returns and return information data, or the disclosure of returns or return information data to such agencies, only to the extent that the statutes of the United States or of such other state, as the case may be, grant substantially similar privileges to the proper officer of this state charged with the administration of the tax laws of this state. (3)  (a)  The return of a person shall, upon written request, be open to inspection by or disclosure to: (i)  In the case of the return of an individual, that individual; (ii)  In the case of an income tax return filed jointly, either of the individuals with respect to whom the return is filed; (iii)  In the case of the return of a partnership, any person who was a member of such partnership during any part of the period covered by the return; (iv)  In the case of the return of a corporation or a subsidiary thereof, any person designated by resolution of its board of directors or other similar governing body, or any officer or employee of such corporation upon written request signed by any principal officer and attested to by the secretary or other officer; (v)  In the case of the return of an estate, the administrator, executor or trustee of such estate, and any heir at law, next of kin or beneficiary under the will, of the decedent, but only to the extent that such latter persons have a material interest which will be affected by information contained therein; (vi)  In the case of the return of a trust, the trustee or trustees, jointly or separately, and any beneficiary of such trust, but only to the extent that such beneficiary has a material interest which will be affected by information contained therein; (vii)  In the case of the return of an individual or a return filed jointly, any claimant agency or claimant local government seeking to collect a debt through the setoff procedure established in Sections 27-7-701 through 27-7-713, Sections 27-7-501 through 27-7-519, Sections 27-7-801 through 27-7-823, or Section 27-7-401, from an individual with respect to whom the return is filed. (b)  If an individual described in paragraph (a) is legally incompetent, the applicable return shall, upon written request, be open to inspection by or disclosure to the committee, trustee or guardian of his estate. (c)  If substantially all of the property of the person with respect to whom the return is filed is in the hands of a trustee in bankruptcy or receiver, such return or returns for prior years of such person shall, upon written request, be open to inspection by or disclosure to such trustee or receiver, but only if the Commissioner of Revenue finds that such receiver or trustee, in his fiduciary capacity, has a material interest which will be affected by information contained therein. (d)  Any return to which this section applies shall, upon written request, also be open to inspection by or disclosure to the attorney-in-fact duly authorized in writing by any of the persons described in paragraph (a) of this subsection to inspect the return or receive the information on his behalf, subject to the conditions provided in paragraph (a). (e)  Return information with respect to any taxpayer may be open to inspection by or disclosure to any person authorized by this subsection to inspect any return of such taxpayer if the Commissioner of Revenue determines that such disclosure would not seriously impair state tax administration. (4)  The State Auditor and the employees of his office shall have the right to examine only such tax returns as are necessary for auditing the Department of Revenue and auditing benefits administered under the United States Department of Health and Human Services and the United States Department of Agriculture.  The State Auditor and the employees of his office may make  information related to auditing such benefits available to and may exchange the information with state agencies responsible for the administration of the benefits.  Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (4), the same prohibitions against disclosure which apply to the Department of Revenue shall apply to the State Auditor and his employees or former employees. (5)  Officers and employees of the Mississippi Development Authority who execute a confidentiality agreement with the Department of Revenue shall be authorized to discuss and examine information to which this section applies at the offices of the Mississippi Department of Revenue.  This disclosure is limited to information necessary to properly administer the programs under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Development Authority.  The Department of Revenue is authorized to disclose to officers and employees of the Mississippi Development Authority who execute a confidentiality agreement the information necessary under the circumstances.  The same prohibitions against disclosure which apply to the Department of Revenue shall apply to the officers or employees of the Mississippi Development Authority. (6)  Information required by the University Research Center to prepare the analyses required by Sections 57-13-101 through 57-13-109 shall be furnished to the University Research Center upon request.  It shall be unlawful for any officer or employee of the University Research Center to divulge or make known in any manner the amount of income or any particulars set forth or disclosed in any information received by the center from the Department of Revenue other than as may be required by Sections 57-13-101 through 57-13-109 in an analysis prepared pursuant to Sections 57-13-101 through 57-13-109. (7)  Information required by the Mississippi Development Authority to prepare the reports required by Section 57-1-12.2 shall be furnished to the Mississippi Development Authority upon request.  It shall be unlawful for any officer or employee of the Mississippi Development Authority to divulge or make known in any manner the amount of income or any particulars set forth or disclosed in any information received by the Mississippi Development Authority from the Department of Revenue other than as may be required by Section 57-1-12.2 in a report prepared pursuant to Section 57-1-12.2. (8)  Information necessary to comply with Chapter 13, Title 85, may be furnished to financial institutions. It shall be unlawful for any officer or employee of the financial institution to divulge or make known in any manner the amount of income or any particulars set forth or disclosed in any information received by the financial institution from the Department of Revenue other than as may be authorized by Chapter 13, Title 85. (9)  The Commissioner of Revenue and the Department of Revenue are authorized to discuss with and provide the Attorney General or his designated representative with information related to an offer to compromise and settle any doubtful claim regarding a finally determined tax liability as authorized by Section 31-19-30.  It shall be unlawful for the Attorney General or any officer or employee of the Attorney General to divulge or make known in any manner the amount of income or any particulars set forth or disclosed in any information received by the Attorney General's office from the Commissioner of Revenue or Department of Revenue other than as may be required by Section 31-19-30. (10)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the publication of statistics, so classified as to prevent the identification of particular reports or returns and the items thereof, or the inspection by the Attorney General, or any other attorney representing the state, of the report or return of any taxpayer who shall bring action to set aside the tax thereon, or against whom any action or proceeding has been instituted to recover any tax or penalty imposed. (11)  Nothing in this section shall prohibit the commissioner from making available information necessary to recover taxes owing the state pursuant to the authority granted in Section 27-75-16. (12)  Reports and returns required under the provisions of this chapter shall be preserved in accordance with approved records control schedules.  No records, however, may be destroyed without the approval of the Director of the Department of Archives and History. (13)  The Department of Revenue is authorized to disclose to the Child Support Unit and to the Fraud Investigation Unit of the Department of Human Services without the need for a subpoena or proper judicial order the name, address, social security number, amount of income, source of income, assets and other relevant information, records and tax forms for individuals who are delinquent in the payment of any child support as defined in Section 93-11-101 or who are under investigation for fraud or abuse of any state or federal program or statute as provided in Section 43-1-23. (14)  Nothing in this section shall prohibit the Department of Revenue from exchanging information with the federal government that is necessary to offset income tax refund payment on debts owed to this state or the United States. (15)  Nothing in this section shall prohibit the department from making available information that is necessary to be disclosed for the administration and enforcement of Section 27-7-87. SECTION 59.  Section 27-65-81, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-65-81.  (1) Applications, returns and information contained therein filed or furnished under this chapter shall be confidential, and except in accordance with proper judicial order, or as otherwise authorized by this section or as authorized by Section 27-4-3, it shall be unlawful for the Commissioner of Revenue or any deputy, agent, clerk or other officer or employee of the Department of Revenue or Department of Information Technology Services, or any former employee thereof, to divulge or make known in any manner the amount of income or any particulars set forth or disclosed on any application, report or return required. The term "proper judicial order" as used in this section shall not include subpoenas or subpoenas duces tecum but shall include only those orders entered by a court of record in this state after furnishing notice and a hearing to the taxpayer and the Department of Revenue.  The court shall not authorize the furnishing of such information unless it is satisfied that the information is needed to pursue pending litigation wherein the return itself is in issue, or the judge is satisfied that the need for furnishing the information outweighs the rights of the taxpayer to have such information secreted. (2)  Such information contained on the application, returns or reports may be furnished to: (a)  Members and employees of the Department of Revenue and the income tax department thereof, for the purpose of checking, comparing and correcting returns; (b)  The Attorney General, or any other attorney representing the state in any action in respect to the amount of tax under the provisions of this chapter; (c)  The revenue department of other states or the federal government when said states or federal government grants a like comity to Mississippi. (3)  The State Auditor and the employees of his office shall have the right to examine only such tax returns as are necessary for auditing the Department of Revenue, and the same prohibitions against disclosure which apply to the Department of Revenue shall apply to the State Auditor and his office. (4)  Officers and employees of the Mississippi Development Authority who execute a confidentiality agreement with the Department of Revenue shall be authorized to discuss and examine information to which this section applies at the offices of the Mississippi Department of Revenue.  This disclosure is limited to information necessary to properly administer the programs under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Development Authority.  The Department of Revenue is authorized to disclose to officers and employees of the Mississippi Development Authority who execute a confidentiality agreement the information necessary under the circumstances. The same prohibitions against disclosure which apply to the Department of Revenue shall apply to the officers or employees of the Mississippi Development Authority. (5)  Information required by the University Research Center to prepare the analyses required by Sections 57-13-101 through 57-13-109 shall be furnished to the University Research Center upon request.  It shall be unlawful for any officer or employee of the University Research Center to divulge or make known in any manner the amount of income or any particulars set forth or disclosed in any information received by the center from the Department of Revenue other than as may be required by Sections 57-13-101 through 57-13-109 in an analysis prepared pursuant to Sections 57-13-101 through 57-13-109. (6)  Information required by the Mississippi Development Authority to prepare the reports required by Section 57-1-12.2 shall be furnished to the Mississippi Development Authority upon request.  It shall be unlawful for any officer or employee of the Mississippi Development Authority to divulge or make known in any manner the amount of income or any particulars set forth or disclosed in any information received by the Mississippi Development Authority from the Department of Revenue other than as may be required by Section 57-1-12.2 in a report prepared pursuant to Section 57-1-12.2. (7)  Information necessary to comply with Chapter 13, Title 85, may be furnished to financial institutions.  It shall be unlawful for any officer or employee of the financial institution to divulge or make known in any manner the amount of income or any particulars set forth or disclosed in any information received by the financial institution from the Department of Revenue other than as may be authorized by Chapter 13, Title 85. (8)  The Commissioner of Revenue and the Department of Revenue are authorized to discuss with and provide the Attorney General or his designated representative with information related to an offer to compromise and settle any doubtful claim regarding a finally determined tax liability as authorized by Section 31-19-30.  It shall be unlawful for the Attorney General or any officer or employee of the Attorney General to divulge or make known in any manner the amount of income or any particulars set forth or disclosed in any information received by the Attorney General's office from the Commissioner of Revenue or Department of Revenue other than as may be required by Section 31-19-30. (9)  Nothing in this section shall prohibit the Commissioner of Revenue from making available information necessary to recover taxes owing the state pursuant to the authority granted in Section 27-75-16. (10)  The Department of Revenue is authorized to disclose to the Child Support Unit and to the Fraud Investigation Unit of the Department of Human Services without the need for a subpoena or proper judicial order the name, address, social security number, amount of income, amount of sales tax, source of income, assets and other relevant information, records and tax forms for individuals who are delinquent in the payment of any child support as defined in Section 93-11-101 or who are under investigation for fraud or abuse of any state or federal program or statute as provided in Section 43-1-23. SECTION 60.  Section 27-104-165, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-104-165.  The Department of Finance and Administration, with assistance from the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services and the State Personnel Board, may develop a phased-in plan that ensures that the procurement portal required under Section 25-53-151 be fully functional by July 1, 2015. SECTION 61.  Section 27-115-49, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-115-49.  (1)  The corporation shall enter into its contracts for major procurements after bidding.  The corporation may adopt administrative rules and regulations pursuant to the provisions of this chapter providing for special procedures whereby the Mississippi Lottery Corporation may make any class of procurement. (2)  In its bidding processes, the corporation may do its own bidding and procurement or may utilize the services of the Department of Finance and Administration, the Department of Information Technology Services, or other state agencies as appropriate and necessary.  The president of the corporation may, with approval of the board, declare an emergency for purchasing purposes which shall be governed by the administrative rules and regulations adopted by the board. SECTION 62.  Section 31-7-10, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 31-7-10.  (1)  For the purposes of this section, the term "equipment" shall mean equipment, furniture, and if applicable, associated software and other applicable direct costs associated with the acquisition.  In addition to its other powers and duties, the Department of Finance and Administration shall have the authority to develop a master lease-purchase program and, pursuant to that program, shall have the authority to execute on behalf of the state master lease-purchase agreements for equipment to be used by an agency, as provided in this section. Each agency electing to acquire equipment by a lease-purchase agreement shall participate in the Department of Finance and Administration's master lease-purchase program, unless the Department of Finance and Administration makes a determination that such equipment cannot be obtained under the program or unless the equipment can be obtained elsewhere at an overall cost lower than that for which the equipment can be obtained under the program.  Such lease-purchase agreements may include the refinancing or consolidation, or both, of any state agency lease-purchase agreements entered into after June 30, 1990. (2)  All funds designated by agencies for procurement of equipment and financing thereof under the master lease-purchase program shall be paid into a special fund created in the State Treasury known as the "Master Lease-Purchase Program Fund," which shall be used by the Department of Finance and Administration for payment to the lessors for equipment acquired under master lease-purchase agreements. (3)  Upon final approval of an appropriation bill, each agency shall submit to the Public Procurement Review Board a schedule of proposed equipment acquisitions for the master lease-purchase program.  Upon approval of an equipment schedule by the Public Procurement Review Board with the advice of the Department of Information Technology Services, the Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management, and the Division of Energy and Transportation of the Mississippi Development Authority as it pertains to energy efficient climate control systems, the Public Procurement Review Board shall forward a copy of the equipment schedule to the Department of Finance and Administration. (4)  The level of lease-purchase debt recommended by the Department of Finance and Administration shall be subject to approval by the State Bond Commission.  After such approval, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be authorized to advertise and solicit written competitive proposals for a lessor, who will purchase the equipment pursuant to bid awards made by the using agency under a given category and then transfer the equipment to the Department of Finance and Administration as lessee, pursuant to a master lease-purchase agreement. The Department of Finance and Administration shall select the successful proposer for the financing of equipment under the master lease-purchase program with the approval of the State Bond Commission. (5)  Each master lease-purchase agreement, and any subsequent amendments, shall include such terms and conditions as the State Bond Commission shall determine to be appropriate and in the public interest, and may include any covenants deemed necessary or desirable to protect the interests of the lessor, including, but not limited to, provisions setting forth the interest rate (or method for computing interest rates) for financing pursuant to such agreement, covenants concerning application of payments and funds held in the Master Lease-Purchase Program Fund, covenants to maintain casualty insurance with respect to equipment subject to the master lease-purchase agreement (and all state agencies are specifically authorized to purchase any insurance required by a master lease-purchase agreement) and covenants precluding or limiting the right of the lessee or user to acquire equipment within a specified time (not to exceed five (5) years) after cancellation on the basis of a failure to appropriate funds for payment of amounts due under a lease-purchase agreement covering comparable equipment. The State Bond Commission shall transmit copies of each such master lease-purchase agreement and each such amendment to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. To the extent provided in any master lease-purchase agreement, title to equipment leased pursuant thereto shall be deemed to be vested in the state or the user of the equipment (as specified in such master lease-purchase agreement), subject to default under or termination of such master lease-purchase agreement. A master lease-purchase agreement may provide for payment by the lessor to the lessee of the purchase price of the equipment to be acquired pursuant thereto prior to the date on which payment is due to the vendor for such equipment and that the lease payments by the lessee shall commence as though the equipment had been provided on the date of payment.  If the lessee, or lessee's escrow agent, has sufficient funds for payment of equipment purchases prior to payment due date to vendor of equipment, such funds shall be held or utilized on an as-needed basis for payment of equipment purchases either by the State Treasurer (in which event the master lease-purchase agreement may include provisions concerning the holding of such funds, the creation of a security interest for the benefit of the lessor in such funds until disbursed and other appropriate provisions approved by the Bond Commission) or by a corporate trustee selected by the Department of Finance and Administration (in which event the Department of Finance and Administration shall have the authority to enter into an agreement with such a corporate trustee containing terms and conditions approved by the Bond Commission).  Earnings on any amount paid by the lessor prior to the acquisition of the equipment may be used to make lease payments under the master lease-purchase agreement or applied to pay costs and expenses incurred in connection with such lease-purchase agreement.  In such event, the equipment-use agreements with the user agency may provide for lease payments to commence upon the date of payment by the lessor and may also provide for a credit against such payments to the extent that investment receipts from investment of the purchase price are to be used to make lease-purchase payments. (6)  The annual rate of interest paid under any lease-purchase agreement authorized under this section shall not exceed the maximum interest rate to maturity on general obligation indebtedness permitted under Section 75-17-101. (7)  The Department of Finance and Administration shall furnish the equipment to the various agencies, also known as the user, pursuant to an equipment-use agreement developed by the Department of Finance and Administration.  Such agreements shall require that all monthly payments due from such agency be paid, transferred or allocated into the Master Lease-Purchase Program Fund pursuant to a schedule established by the Department of Finance and Administration.  In the event such sums are not paid by the defined payment period, the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration shall issue a requisition for a warrant to draw such amount as may be due from any funds appropriated for the use of the agency which has failed to make the payment as agreed. (8)  All master lease-purchase agreements executed under the authority of this section shall contain the following annual allocation dependency clause or an annual allocation dependency clause which is substantially equivalent thereto:  "The continuation of each equipment schedule to this agreement is contingent in whole or in part upon the appropriation of funds by the Legislature to make the lease-purchase payments required under such equipment schedule.  If the Legislature fails to appropriate sufficient funds to provide for the continuation of the lease-purchase payments under any such equipment schedule, then the obligations of the lessee and of the agency to make such lease-purchase payments and the corresponding provisions of any such equipment schedule to this agreement shall terminate on the last day of the fiscal year for which appropriations were made." (9)  The maximum lease term for any equipment acquired under the master lease-purchase program shall not exceed the useful life of such equipment as determined according to the upper limit of the asset depreciation range (ADR) guidelines for the Class Life Asset Depreciation Range System established by the Internal Revenue Service pursuant to the United States Internal Revenue Code and Regulations thereunder as in effect on December 31, 1980, or comparable depreciation guidelines with respect to any equipment not covered by ADR guidelines.  The Department of Finance and Administration shall be deemed to have met the requirements of this subsection if the term of a master lease-purchase agreement does not exceed the weighted average useful life of all equipment covered by such agreement and the schedules thereto as determined by the Department of Finance and Administration.  For purposes of this subsection, the "term of a master lease-purchase agreement" shall be the weighted average maturity of all principal payments to be made under such master lease-purchase agreement and all schedules thereto. (10)  Interest paid on any master lease-purchase agreement under this section shall be exempt from State of Mississippi income taxation.  All equipment, and the purchase thereof by any lessor, acquired under the master lease-purchase program and all lease-purchase payments with respect thereto shall be exempt from all Mississippi sales, use and ad valorem taxes. (11)  The Governor, in his annual executive budget to the Legislature, shall recommend appropriations sufficient to provide funds to pay all amounts due and payable during the applicable fiscal year under master lease-purchase agreements entered into pursuant to this section. (12)  Any master lease-purchase agreement reciting in substance that such agreement has been entered into pursuant to this section shall be conclusively deemed to have been entered into in accordance with all of the provisions and conditions set forth in this section.  Any defect or irregularity arising with respect to procedures applicable to the acquisition of any equipment shall not invalidate or otherwise limit the obligation of the Department of Finance and Administration, or the state or any agency of the state, under any master lease-purchase agreement or any equipment-use agreement. (13)  There shall be maintained by the Department of Finance and Administration, with respect to each master lease-purchase agreement, an itemized statement of the cash price, interest rates, interest costs, commissions, debt service schedules and all other costs and expenses paid by the state incident to the lease-purchase of equipment under such agreement. (14)  Lease-purchase agreements entered into by the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning pursuant to the authority of Section 37-101-413 or by any other agency which has specific statutory authority other than pursuant to Section 31-7-13(e) to acquire equipment by lease-purchase shall not be made pursuant to the master lease-purchase program under this section, unless the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning or such other agency elects to participate as to part or all of its lease-purchase acquisitions in the master lease-purchase program pursuant to this section. (15)  The Department of Finance and Administration may develop a master lease-purchase program for school districts and, pursuant to that program, may execute on behalf of the school districts master lease-purchase agreements for equipment to be used by the school districts.  The form and structure of this program shall be substantially the same as set forth in this section for the master lease-purchase program for state agencies.  If sums due from a school district under the master lease-purchase program are not paid by the expiration of the defined payment period, the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration may withhold such amount that is due from the school district's allotments of the total funding formula funds as determined by Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215. (16)  The Department of Finance and Administration may develop a master lease-purchase program for community and junior college districts and, pursuant to that program, may execute on behalf of the community and junior college districts master lease-purchase agreements for equipment to be used by the community and junior college districts.  The form and structure of this program must be substantially the same as set forth in this section for the master lease-purchase program for state agencies.  If sums due from a community or junior college district under the master lease-purchase program are not paid by the expiration of the defined payment period, the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration may withhold an amount equal to the amount due under the program from any funds allocated for that community or junior college district in the state appropriations for the use and support of the community and junior colleges. (17)  From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law. (18)  From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section. SECTION 63.  Section 31-7-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 31-7-13.  All agencies and governing authorities shall purchase their commodities and printing; contract for garbage collection or disposal; contract for solid waste collection or disposal; contract for sewage collection or disposal; contract for public construction; and contract for rentals as herein provided. (a)  Bidding procedure for purchases not over $5,000.00.  Purchases which do not involve an expenditure of more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), exclusive of freight or shipping charges, may be made without advertising or otherwise requesting competitive bids.  However, nothing contained in this paragraph (a) shall be construed to prohibit any agency or governing authority from establishing procedures which require competitive bids on purchases of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or less. (b)  Bidding procedure for purchases over $5,000.00 but not over $75,000.00.  Purchases which involve an expenditure of more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) but not more than Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00), exclusive of freight and shipping charges, may be made from the lowest and best bidder without publishing or posting advertisement for bids, provided at least two (2) competitive written bids have been obtained.  Any state agency or community or junior college purchasing commodities or procuring construction pursuant to this paragraph (b) may authorize its purchasing agent, or his designee, to accept the lowest competitive written bid under Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00).  Any governing authority purchasing commodities pursuant to this paragraph (b) may authorize its purchasing agent, or his designee, with regard to governing authorities other than counties, or its purchase clerk, or his designee, with regard to counties, to accept the lowest and best competitive written bid.  Such authorization shall be made in writing by the governing authority and shall be maintained on file in the primary office of the agency and recorded in the official minutes of the governing authority, as appropriate.  The purchasing agent or the purchase clerk, or his designee, as the case may be, and not the governing authority, shall be liable for any penalties and/or damages as may be imposed by law for any act or omission of the purchasing agent or purchase clerk, or his designee, constituting a violation of law in accepting any bid without approval by the governing authority.  The term "competitive written bid" shall mean a bid submitted on a bid form furnished by the buying agency or governing authority and signed by authorized personnel representing the vendor, or a bid submitted on a vendor's letterhead or identifiable bid form and signed by authorized personnel representing the vendor.  "Competitive" shall mean that the bids are developed based upon comparable identification of the needs and are developed independently and without knowledge of other bids or prospective bids.  Any bid item for construction in excess of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) shall be broken down by components to provide detail of component description and pricing.  These details shall be submitted with the written bids and become part of the bid evaluation criteria.  Bids may be submitted by facsimile, electronic mail or other generally accepted method of information distribution.  Bids submitted by electronic transmission shall not require the signature of the vendor's representative unless required by agencies or governing authorities. (c)  Bidding procedure for purchases over $75,000.00. (i)  Publication requirement. 1. Purchases which involve an expenditure of more than Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00), exclusive of freight and shipping charges, may be made from the lowest and best bidder after advertising for competitive bids once each week for two (2) consecutive weeks in a regular newspaper published in the county or municipality in which such agency or governing authority is located. However, all American Recovery and Reinvestment Act projects in excess of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) shall be bid.  All references to American Recovery and Reinvestment Act projects in this section shall not apply to programs identified in Division B of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act. 2.  Reverse auctions shall be the primary method for receiving bids during the bidding process.  If a purchasing entity determines that a reverse auction is not in the best interest of the state, then that determination must be approved by the Public Procurement Review Board.  The purchasing entity shall submit a detailed explanation of why a reverse auction would not be in the best interest of the state and present an alternative process to be approved by the Public Procurement Review Board.  If the Public Procurement Review Board authorizes the purchasing entity to solicit bids with a method other than reverse auction, then the purchasing entity may designate the other methods by which the bids will be received, including, but not limited to, bids sealed in an envelope, bids received electronically in a secure system, or bids received by any other method that promotes open competition and has been approved by the Office of Purchasing and Travel.  However, reverse auction shall not be used for any public contract for design, construction, improvement, repair or remodeling of any public facilities, including the purchase of materials, supplies, equipment or goods for same and including buildings, roads and bridges.  The Public Procurement Review Board must approve any contract entered into by alternative process.  The provisions of this item 2 shall not apply to the individual state institutions of higher learning.  The provisions of this item 2 requiring reverse auction as the primary method of receiving bids shall not apply to term contract purchases as provided in paragraph (n) of this section; however, a purchasing entity may, in its discretion, utilize reverse auction for such purchases.  The provisions of this item 2 shall not apply to individual public schools, including public charter schools and public school districts, only when purchasing copyrighted educational supplemental materials and software as a service product.  For such purchases, a local school board may authorize a purchasing entity in its jurisdiction to use a Request for Qualifications which promotes open competition and meets the requirements of the Office of Purchasing and Travel. 3.  The date as published for the bid opening shall not be less than seven (7) working days after the last published notice; however, if the purchase involves a construction project in which the estimated cost is in excess of Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00), such bids shall not be opened in less than fifteen (15) working days after the last notice is published and the notice for the purchase of such construction shall be published once each week for two (2) consecutive weeks.   The notice of intention to let contracts or purchase equipment shall state the time and place at which bids shall be received, list the contracts to be made or types of equipment or supplies to be purchased, and, if all plans and/or specifications are not published, refer to the plans and/or specifications on file.  If there is no newspaper published in the county or municipality, then such notice shall be given by posting same at the courthouse, or for municipalities at the city hall, and at two (2) other public places in the county or municipality, and also by publication once each week for two (2) consecutive weeks in some newspaper having a general circulation in the county or municipality in the above-provided manner.  On the same date that the notice is submitted to the newspaper for publication, the agency or governing authority involved shall mail written notice to, or provide electronic notification to the main office of the Mississippi Procurement Technical Assistance Program under the Mississippi Development Authority that contains the same information as that in the published notice.  Within one (1) working day of the contract award, the agency or governing authority shall post to the designated web page maintained by the Department of Finance and Administration, notice of the award, including the award recipient, the contract amount, and a brief summary of the contract in accordance with rules promulgated by the department.  Within one (1) working day of the contract execution, the agency or governing authority shall post to the designated web page maintained by the Department of Finance and Administration a summary of the executed contract and make a copy of the appropriately redacted contract documents available for linking to the designated web page in accordance with the rules promulgated by the department.  The information provided by the agency or governing authority shall be posted to the web page until the project is completed. 4.  Agencies and governing authorities using federal funds for the procurement of any good or service, including exempt personal and professional services, must comply with the Uniform Administrative Requirements, Cost Principles, and Audit Requirements for Federal Awards - Subpart D - Post Federal Award Requirements Procurement Standards, in accordance with 2 CFR 200.317 through 2 CFR 200.327. (ii)  Bidding process amendment procedure.  If all plans and/or specifications are published in the notification, then the plans and/or specifications may not be amended.  If all plans and/or specifications are not published in the notification, then amendments to the plans/specifications, bid opening date, bid opening time and place may be made, provided that the agency or governing authority maintains a list of all prospective bidders who are known to have received a copy of the bid documents and all such prospective bidders are sent copies of all amendments.  This notification of amendments may be made via mail, facsimile, electronic mail or other generally accepted method of information distribution.  No addendum to bid specifications may be issued within two (2) working days of the time established for the receipt of bids unless such addendum also amends the bid opening to a date not less than five (5) working days after the date of the addendum. (iii)  Filing requirement.  In all cases involving governing authorities, before the notice shall be published or posted, the plans or specifications for the construction or equipment being sought shall be filed with the clerk of the board of the governing authority.  In addition to these requirements, a bid file shall be established which shall indicate those vendors to whom such solicitations and specifications were issued, and such file shall also contain such information as is pertinent to the bid. (iv)  Specification restrictions. 1. Specifications pertinent to such bidding shall be written so as not to exclude comparable equipment of domestic manufacture.  However, if valid justification is presented, the Department of Finance and Administration or the board of a governing authority may approve a request for specific equipment necessary to perform a specific job.  Further, such justification, when placed on the minutes of the board of a governing authority, may serve as authority for that governing authority to write specifications to require a specific item of equipment needed to perform a specific job.  In addition to these requirements, from and after July 1, 1990, vendors of relocatable classrooms and the specifications for the purchase of such relocatable classrooms published by local school boards shall meet all pertinent regulations of the State Board of Education, including prior approval of such bid by the State Department of Education. 2. Specifications for construction projects may include an allowance for commodities, equipment, furniture, construction materials or systems in which prospective bidders are instructed to include in their bids specified amounts for such items so long as the allowance items are acquired by the vendor in a commercially reasonable manner and approved by the agency/governing authority. Such acquisitions shall not be made to circumvent the public purchasing laws. (v)  Electronic bids.  Agencies and governing authorities shall provide a secure electronic interactive system for the submittal of bids requiring competitive bidding that shall be an additional bidding option for those bidders who choose to submit their bids electronically.  The Department of Finance and Administration shall provide, by regulation, the standards that agencies must follow when receiving electronic bids.  Agencies and governing authorities shall make the appropriate provisions necessary to accept electronic bids from those bidders who choose to submit their bids electronically for all purchases requiring competitive bidding under this section.  Any special condition or requirement for the electronic bid submission shall be specified in the advertisement for bids required by this section.  Agencies or governing authorities that are currently without available high speed Internet access shall be exempt from the requirement of this subparagraph (v) until such time that high speed Internet access becomes available.  Any county having a population of less than twenty thousand (20,000) shall be exempt from the provisions of this subparagraph (v).  Any municipality having a population of less than ten thousand (10,000) shall be exempt from the provisions of this subparagraph (v).  The provisions of this subparagraph (v) shall not require any bidder to submit bids electronically.  When construction bids are submitted electronically, the requirement for including a certificate of responsibility, or a statement that the bid enclosed does not exceed Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), on the exterior of the bid envelope as indicated in Section 31-3-21(1) and (2) shall be deemed in compliance with by including same as an attachment with the electronic bid submittal. (d)  Lowest and best bid decision procedure. (i)  Decision procedure.  Purchases may be made from the lowest and best bidder.  In determining the lowest and best bid, freight and shipping charges shall be included.  Life-cycle costing, total cost bids, warranties, guaranteed buy-back provisions and other relevant provisions may be included in the best bid calculation.  All best bid procedures for state agencies must be in compliance with regulations established by the Department of Finance and Administration. If any governing authority accepts a bid other than the lowest bid actually submitted, it shall place on its minutes detailed calculations and narrative summary showing that the accepted bid was determined to be the lowest and best bid, including the dollar amount of the accepted bid and the dollar amount of the lowest bid.  No agency or governing authority shall accept a bid based on items not included in the specifications. (ii)  Decision procedure for Certified Purchasing Offices.  In addition to the decision procedure set forth in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph (d), Certified Purchasing Offices may also use the following procedure:  Purchases may be made from the bidder offering the best value.  In determining the best value bid, freight and shipping charges shall be included.  Life-cycle costing, total cost bids, warranties, guaranteed buy-back provisions, documented previous experience, training costs and other relevant provisions, including, but not limited to, a bidder having a local office and inventory located within the jurisdiction of the governing authority, may be included in the best value calculation.  This provision shall authorize Certified Purchasing Offices to utilize a Request For Proposals (RFP) process when purchasing commodities.  All best value procedures for state agencies must be in compliance with regulations established by the Department of Finance and Administration.  No agency or governing authority shall accept a bid based on items or criteria not included in the specifications. (iii)  Decision procedure for Prequalified Construction.  In addition to the decision procedure set forth in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph (d), where purchase involves renovation, restoration, or both, of the State Capitol Building or any other historical building designated for at least five (5) years as a Mississippi Landmark by the Board of Trustees of the Department of Archives and History under the authority of Sections 39-7-7 and 39-7-11, or for any other construction procurement with a minimum construction cost of Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) where the agency or governing authority has determined that prequalification of bidders is in the best interest of the state, the agency or governing authority may use the following procedure:  Purchases may be made from the lowest and best prequalified bidder.  Solicitation of the prequalification of bidders shall be in accordance with paragraph (c) of this section and shall be determined not less than fifteen (15) working days before the prequalified bidders are invited to submit bids.  Prequalification criteria shall be limited to bidder's and proposed sub-contractor's knowledge and experience on projects of similar size and scope, past performance, project management team and financial stability.  All best bid and prequalification procedures for state agencies must be in compliance with regulations established by the Department of Finance and Administration.  If any governing authority accepts a bid other than the lowest bid actually submitted, it shall place on its minutes detailed calculations and narrative summary showing that the accepted bid was determined to be the lowest and best bid, including the dollar amount of the accepted bid and the dollar amount of the lowest bid.  No agency or governing authority shall accept a bid based on items not included in the specifications. (iv)  Construction project negotiations authority.  If the lowest and best bid is not more than ten percent (10%) above the amount of funds allocated for a public construction or renovation project, then the agency or governing authority shall be permitted to negotiate with the lowest bidder in order to enter into a contract for an amount not to exceed the funds allocated. (e)  Lease-purchase authorization.  For the purposes of this section, the term "equipment" shall mean equipment, furniture and, if applicable, associated software and other applicable direct costs associated with the acquisition.  Any lease-purchase of equipment which an agency is not required to lease-purchase under the master lease-purchase program pursuant to Section 31-7-10 and any lease-purchase of equipment which a governing authority elects to lease-purchase may be acquired by a lease-purchase agreement under this paragraph (e).  Lease-purchase financing may also be obtained from the vendor or from a third-party source after having solicited and obtained at least two (2) written competitive bids, as defined in paragraph (b) of this section, for such financing without advertising for such bids.  Solicitation for the bids for financing may occur before or after acceptance of bids for the purchase of such equipment or, where no such bids for purchase are required, at any time before the purchase thereof.  No such lease-purchase agreement shall be for an annual rate of interest which is greater than the overall maximum interest rate to maturity on general obligation indebtedness permitted under Section 75-17-101, and the term of such lease-purchase agreement shall not exceed the useful life of equipment covered thereby as determined according to the upper limit of the asset depreciation range (ADR) guidelines for the Class Life Asset Depreciation Range System established by the Internal Revenue Service pursuant to the United States Internal Revenue Code and regulations thereunder as in effect on December 31, 1980, or comparable depreciation guidelines with respect to any equipment not covered by ADR guidelines.  Any lease-purchase agreement entered into pursuant to this paragraph (e) may contain any of the terms and conditions which a master lease-purchase agreement may contain under the provisions of Section 31-7-10(5), and shall contain an annual allocation dependency clause substantially similar to that set forth in Section 31-7-10(8).  Each agency or governing authority entering into a lease-purchase transaction pursuant to this paragraph (e) shall maintain with respect to each such lease-purchase transaction the same information as required to be maintained by the Department of Finance and Administration pursuant to Section 31-7-10(13).  However, nothing contained in this section shall be construed to permit agencies to acquire items of equipment with a total acquisition cost in the aggregate of less than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) by a single lease-purchase transaction.  All equipment, and the purchase thereof by any lessor, acquired by lease-purchase under this paragraph and all lease-purchase payments with respect thereto shall be exempt from all Mississippi sales, use and ad valorem taxes.  Interest paid on any lease-purchase agreement under this section shall be exempt from State of Mississippi income taxation. (f)  Alternate bid authorization.  When necessary to ensure ready availability of commodities for public works and the timely completion of public projects, no more than two (2) alternate bids may be accepted by a governing authority for commodities. No purchases may be made through use of such alternate bids procedure unless the lowest and best bidder cannot deliver the commodities contained in his bid.  In that event, purchases of such commodities may be made from one (1) of the bidders whose bid was accepted as an alternate. (g)  Construction contract change authorization.  In the event a determination is made by an agency or governing authority after a construction contract is let that changes or modifications to the original contract are necessary or would better serve the purpose of the agency or the governing authority, such agency or governing authority may, in its discretion, order such changes pertaining to the construction that are necessary under the circumstances without the necessity of further public bids; provided that such change shall be made in a commercially reasonable manner and shall not be made to circumvent the public purchasing statutes.  In addition to any other authorized person, the architect or engineer hired by an agency or governing authority with respect to any public construction contract shall have the authority, when granted by an agency or governing authority, to authorize changes or modifications to the original contract without the necessity of prior approval of the agency or governing authority when any such change or modification is less than one percent (1%) of the total contract amount.  The agency or governing authority may limit the number, manner or frequency of such emergency changes or modifications. (h)  Petroleum purchase alternative.  In addition to other methods of purchasing authorized in this chapter, when any agency or governing authority shall have a need for gas, diesel fuel, oils and/or other petroleum products in excess of the amount set forth in paragraph (a) of this section, such agency or governing authority may purchase the commodity after having solicited and obtained at least two (2) competitive written bids, as defined in paragraph (b) of this section.  If two (2) competitive written bids are not obtained, the entity shall comply with the procedures set forth in paragraph (c) of this section. In the event any agency or governing authority shall have advertised for bids for the purchase of gas, diesel fuel, oils and other petroleum products and coal and no acceptable bids can be obtained, such agency or governing authority is authorized and directed to enter into any negotiations necessary to secure the lowest and best contract available for the purchase of such commodities. (i)  Road construction petroleum products price adjustment clause authorization.  Any agency or governing authority authorized to enter into contracts for the construction, maintenance, surfacing or repair of highways, roads or streets, may include in its bid proposal and contract documents a price adjustment clause with relation to the cost to the contractor, including taxes, based upon an industry-wide cost index, of petroleum products including asphalt used in the performance or execution of the contract or in the production or manufacture of materials for use in such performance.  Such industry-wide index shall be established and published monthly by the Mississippi Department of Transportation with a copy thereof to be mailed, upon request, to the clerks of the governing authority of each municipality and the clerks of each board of supervisors throughout the state.  The price adjustment clause shall be based on the cost of such petroleum products only and shall not include any additional profit or overhead as part of the adjustment.  The bid proposals or document contract shall contain the basis and methods of adjusting unit prices for the change in the cost of such petroleum products. (j)  State agency emergency purchase procedure.  If the governing board or the executive head, or his designees, of any agency of the state shall determine that an emergency exists in regard to the purchase of any commodities or repair contracts, so that the delay incident to giving opportunity for competitive bidding would be detrimental to the interests of the state, then the head of such agency, or his designees, shall file with the Department of Finance and Administration (i) a statement explaining the conditions and circumstances of the emergency, which shall include a detailed description of the events leading up to the situation and the negative impact to the entity if the purchase is made following the statutory requirements set forth in paragraph (a), (b) or (c) of this section, and (ii) a certified copy of the appropriate minutes of the board of such agency requesting the emergency purchase, if applicable. Upon receipt of the statement and applicable board certification, the State Fiscal Officer, or his designees, may, in writing, authorize the purchase or repair without having to comply with competitive bidding requirements. If the governing board or the executive head, or his designees, of any agency determines that an emergency exists in regard to the purchase of any commodities or repair contracts, so that the delay incident to giving opportunity for competitive bidding would threaten the health or safety of any person, or the preservation or protection of property, then the provisions in this section for competitive bidding shall not apply, and any officer or agent of the agency having general or specific authority for making the purchase or repair contract shall approve the bill presented for payment, and he shall certify in writing from whom the purchase was made, or with whom the repair contract was made. Total purchases made under this paragraph (j) shall only be for the purpose of meeting needs created by the emergency situation.  Following the emergency purchase, documentation of the purchase, including a description of the commodity purchased, the purchase price thereof and the nature of the emergency shall be filed with the Department of Finance and Administration.  Any contract awarded pursuant to this paragraph (j) shall not exceed a term of one (1) year. Purchases under the grant program established under Section 37-68-7 in response to COVID-19 and the directive that school districts create a distance learning plan and fulfill technology needs expeditiously shall be deemed an emergency purchase for purposes of this paragraph (j). (k)  Governing authority emergency purchase procedure.  If the governing authority, or the governing authority acting through its designee, shall determine that an emergency exists in regard to the purchase of any commodities or repair contracts, so that the delay incident to giving opportunity for competitive bidding would be detrimental to the interest of the governing authority, then the provisions herein for competitive bidding shall not apply and any officer or agent of such governing authority having general or special authority therefor in making such purchase or repair shall approve the bill presented therefor, and he shall certify in writing thereon from whom such purchase was made, or with whom such a repair contract was made.  At the board meeting next following the emergency purchase or repair contract, documentation of the purchase or repair contract, including a description of the commodity purchased, the price thereof and the nature of the emergency shall be presented to the board and shall be placed on the minutes of the board of such governing authority.  Purchases under the grant program established under Section 37-68-7 in response to COVID-19 and the directive that school districts create a distance learning plan and fulfill technology needs expeditiously shall be deemed an emergency purchase for purposes of this paragraph (k). (l)  Hospital purchase, lease-purchase and lease authorization. (i)  The commissioners or board of trustees of any public hospital may contract with such lowest and best bidder for the purchase or lease-purchase of any commodity under a contract of purchase or lease-purchase agreement whose obligatory payment terms do not exceed five (5) years. (ii)  In addition to the authority granted in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph (l), the commissioners or board of trustees is authorized to enter into contracts for the lease of equipment or services, or both, which it considers necessary for the proper care of patients if, in its opinion, it is not financially feasible to purchase the necessary equipment or services.  Any such contract for the lease of equipment or services executed by the commissioners or board shall not exceed a maximum of five (5) years' duration and shall include a cancellation clause based on unavailability of funds.  If such cancellation clause is exercised, there shall be no further liability on the part of the lessee.  Any such contract for the lease of equipment or services executed on behalf of the commissioners or board that complies with the provisions of this subparagraph (ii) shall be excepted from the bid requirements set forth in this section. (m)  Exceptions from bidding requirements.  Excepted from bid requirements are: (i)  Purchasing agreements approved by department.  Purchasing agreements, contracts and maximum price regulations executed or approved by the Department of Finance and Administration. (ii)  Outside equipment repairs.  Repairs to equipment, when such repairs are made by repair facilities in the private sector; however, engines, transmissions, rear axles and/or other such components shall not be included in this exemption when replaced as a complete unit instead of being repaired and the need for such total component replacement is known before disassembly of the component; however, invoices identifying the equipment, specific repairs made, parts identified by number and name, supplies used in such repairs, and the number of hours of labor and costs therefor shall be required for the payment for such repairs. (iii)  In-house equipment repairs.  Purchases of parts for repairs to equipment, when such repairs are made by personnel of the agency or governing authority; however, entire assemblies, such as engines or transmissions, shall not be included in this exemption when the entire assembly is being replaced instead of being repaired. (iv)  Raw gravel or dirt.  Raw unprocessed deposits of gravel or fill dirt which are to be removed and transported by the purchaser. (v)  Governmental equipment auctions.  Motor vehicles or other equipment purchased from a federal agency or authority, another governing authority or state agency of the State of Mississippi, or any governing authority or state agency of another state at a public auction held for the purpose of disposing of such vehicles or other equipment.  Any purchase by a governing authority under the exemption authorized by this subparagraph (v) shall require advance authorization spread upon the minutes of the governing authority to include the listing of the item or items authorized to be purchased and the maximum bid authorized to be paid for each item or items. (vi)  Intergovernmental sales and transfers.  Purchases, sales, transfers or trades by governing authorities or state agencies when such purchases, sales, transfers or trades are made by a private treaty agreement or through means of negotiation, from any federal agency or authority, another governing authority or state agency of the State of Mississippi, or any state agency or governing authority of another state.  Nothing in this section shall permit such purchases through public auction except as provided for in subparagraph (v) of this paragraph (m).  It is the intent of this section to allow governmental entities to dispose of and/or purchase commodities from other governmental entities at a price that is agreed to by both parties.  This shall allow for purchases and/or sales at prices which may be determined to be below the market value if the selling entity determines that the sale at below market value is in the best interest of the taxpayers of the state.  Governing authorities shall place the terms of the agreement and any justification on the minutes, and state agencies shall obtain approval from the Department of Finance and Administration, prior to releasing or taking possession of the commodities. (vii)  Perishable supplies or food.  Perishable supplies or food purchased for use in connection with hospitals, the school lunch programs, homemaking programs and for the feeding of county or municipal prisoners. (viii)  Single-source items.  Noncompetitive items available from one (1) source only.  In connection with the purchase of noncompetitive items only available from one (1) source, a certification of the conditions and circumstances requiring the purchase shall be filed by the agency with the Department of Finance and Administration and by the governing authority with the board of the governing authority.  Upon receipt of that certification the Department of Finance and Administration or the board of the governing authority, as the case may be, may, in writing, authorize the purchase, which authority shall be noted on the minutes of the body at the next regular meeting thereafter.  In those situations, a governing authority is not required to obtain the approval of the Department of Finance and Administration.  Following the purchase, the executive head of the state agency, or his designees, shall file with the Department of Finance and Administration, documentation of the purchase, including a description of the commodity purchased, the purchase price thereof and the source from whom it was purchased. (ix)  Waste disposal facility construction contracts.  Construction of incinerators and other facilities for disposal of solid wastes in which products either generated therein, such as steam, or recovered therefrom, such as materials for recycling, are to be sold or otherwise disposed of; however, in constructing such facilities, a governing authority or agency shall publicly issue requests for proposals, advertised for in the same manner as provided herein for seeking bids for public construction projects, concerning the design, construction, ownership, operation and/or maintenance of such facilities, wherein such requests for proposals when issued shall contain terms and conditions relating to price, financial responsibility, technology, environmental compatibility, legal responsibilities and such other matters as are determined by the governing authority or agency to be appropriate for inclusion; and after responses to the request for proposals have been duly received, the governing authority or agency may select the most qualified proposal or proposals on the basis of price, technology and other relevant factors and from such proposals, but not limited to the terms thereof, negotiate and enter contracts with one or more of the persons or firms submitting proposals. (x)  Hospital group purchase contracts.  Supplies, commodities and equipment purchased by hospitals through group purchase programs pursuant to Section 31-7-38. (xi)  Information technology products.  Purchases of information technology products made by governing authorities under the provisions of purchase schedules, or contracts executed or approved by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services and designated for use by governing authorities. (xii)  Energy efficiency services and equipment.  Energy efficiency services and equipment acquired by school districts, community and junior colleges, institutions of higher learning and state agencies or other applicable governmental entities on a shared-savings, lease or lease-purchase basis pursuant to Section 31-7-14. (xiii)  Municipal electrical utility system fuel.  Purchases of coal and/or natural gas by municipally owned electric power generating systems that have the capacity to use both coal and natural gas for the generation of electric power. (xiv)  Library books and other reference materials.  Purchases by libraries or for libraries of books and periodicals; processed film, videocassette tapes, filmstrips and slides; recorded audiotapes, cassettes and diskettes; and any such items as would be used for teaching, research or other information distribution; however, equipment such as projectors, recorders, audio or video equipment, and monitor televisions are not exempt under this subparagraph. (xv)  Unmarked vehicles.  Purchases of unmarked vehicles when such purchases are made in accordance with purchasing regulations adopted by the Department of Finance and Administration pursuant to Section 31-7-9(2). (xvi)  Election ballots.  Purchases of ballots printed pursuant to Section 23-15-351. (xvii)  Multichannel interactive video systems.  From and after July 1, 1990, contracts by Mississippi Authority for Educational Television with any private educational institution or private nonprofit organization whose purposes are educational in regard to the construction, purchase, lease or lease-purchase of facilities and equipment and the employment of personnel for providing multichannel interactive video systems (ITSF) in the school districts of this state. (xviii)  Purchases of prison industry products by the Department of Corrections, regional correctional facilities or privately owned prisons.  Purchases made by the Mississippi Department of Corrections, regional correctional facilities or privately owned prisons involving any item that is manufactured, processed, grown or produced from the state's prison industries. (xix)  Undercover operations equipment.  Purchases of surveillance equipment or any other high-tech equipment to be used by law enforcement agents in undercover operations, provided that any such purchase shall be in compliance with regulations established by the Department of Finance and Administration. (xx)  Junior college books for rent.  Purchases by community or junior colleges of textbooks which are obtained for the purpose of renting such books to students as part of a book service system. (xxi)  Certain school district purchases.  Purchases of commodities made by school districts from vendors with which any levying authority of the school district, as defined in Section 37-57-1, has contracted through competitive bidding procedures for purchases of the same commodities. (xxii)  Garbage, solid waste and sewage contracts.  Contracts for garbage collection or disposal, contracts for solid waste collection or disposal and contracts for sewage collection or disposal. (xxiii)  Municipal water tank maintenance contracts.  Professional maintenance program contracts for the repair or maintenance of municipal water tanks, which provide professional services needed to maintain municipal water storage tanks for a fixed annual fee for a duration of two (2) or more years. (xxiv)  Purchases of Mississippi Industries for the Blind products or services.  Purchases made by state agencies or governing authorities involving any item that is manufactured, processed or produced by, or any services provided by, the Mississippi Industries for the Blind. (xxv)  Purchases of state-adopted textbooks.  Purchases of state-adopted textbooks by public school districts. (xxvi)  Certain purchases under the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Act.  Contracts entered into pursuant to the provisions of Section 57-75-9(2), (3) and (4). (xxvii)  Used heavy or specialized machinery or equipment for installation of soil and water conservation practices purchased at auction.  Used heavy or specialized machinery or equipment used for the installation and implementation of soil and water conservation practices or measures purchased subject to the restrictions provided in Sections 69-27-331 through 69-27-341.  Any purchase by the State Soil and Water Conservation Commission under the exemption authorized by this subparagraph shall require advance authorization spread upon the minutes of the commission to include the listing of the item or items authorized to be purchased and the maximum bid authorized to be paid for each item or items. (xxviii)  Hospital lease of equipment or services.  Leases by hospitals of equipment or services if the leases are in compliance with paragraph (l)(ii). (xxix)  Purchases made pursuant to qualified cooperative purchasing agreements.  Purchases made by certified purchasing offices of state agencies or governing authorities under cooperative purchasing agreements previously approved by the Office of Purchasing and Travel and established by or for any municipality, county, parish or state government or the federal government, provided that the notification to potential contractors includes a clause that sets forth the availability of the cooperative purchasing agreement to other governmental entities.  Such purchases shall only be made if the use of the cooperative purchasing agreements is determined to be in the best interest of the governmental entity. (xxx)  School yearbooks.  Purchases of school yearbooks by state agencies or governing authorities; however, state agencies and governing authorities shall use for these purchases the RFP process as set forth in the Mississippi Procurement Manual adopted by the Office of Purchasing and Travel. (xxxi)  Design-build method of contracting and certain other contracts.  Contracts entered into under the provisions of Section 31-7-13.1, 37-101-44 or 65-1-85. (xxxii)  Toll roads and bridge construction projects.  Contracts entered into under the provisions of Section 65-43-1 or 65-43-3. (xxxiii)  Certain purchases under Section 57-1-221.  Contracts entered into pursuant to the provisions of Section 57-1-221. (xxxiv)  Certain transfers made pursuant to the provisions of Section 57-105-1(7). Transfers of public property or facilities under Section 57-105-1(7) and construction related to such public property or facilities. (xxxv)  Certain purchases or transfers entered into with local electrical power associations. Contracts or agreements entered into under the provisions of Section 55-3-33. (xxxvi)  Certain purchases by an academic medical center or health sciences school.  Purchases by an academic medical center or health sciences school, as defined in Section 37-115-50, of commodities that are used for clinical purposes and 1. intended for use in the diagnosis of disease or other conditions or in the cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of disease, and 2. medical devices, biological, drugs and radiation-emitting devices as defined by the United States Food and Drug Administration. (xxxvii)  Certain purchases made under the Alyce G. Clarke Mississippi Lottery Law. Contracts made by the Mississippi Lottery Corporation pursuant to the Alyce G. Clarke Mississippi Lottery Law. (xxxviii)  Certain purchases made by the Department of Health and the Department of Revenue. Purchases made by the Department of Health and the Department of Revenue solely for the purpose of fulfilling their respective responsibilities under the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act.  This subparagraph shall stand repealed on June 30, 2026. (xxxix) Purchases made by state agencies related to museum exhibits.  Purchases made by an agency related to the fabrication, construction, installation or refurbishing of museum exhibits.  An agency making a purchase under this exemption in excess of the bid threshold set forth in paragraph (c) of this section shall publicly advertise a Request for Qualifications or Request for Proposals in which price as an evaluation factor is at least twenty percent (20%) out of the one hundred percent (100%) total weight, but shall be otherwise exempt.  Any contract arising from a purchase using this exemption must be approved by the Public Procurement Review Board prior to execution by the agency.  The agency shall submit a written report on December 1 of each year to the Chairs of the Senate and House Appropriations Committees, the Chairs of the Senate and House Accountability, Efficiency and Transparency Committees and the Chair of the Public Procurement Review Board, identifying all purchases made by the agency using this exemption in which the cost of the option selected by the agency was more than twenty-five percent (25%) higher than the lowest cost option available. (n)  Term contract authorization.  All contracts for the purchase of: (i)  All contracts for the purchase of commodities, equipment and public construction (including, but not limited to, repair and maintenance), may be let for periods of not more than sixty (60) months in advance, subject to applicable statutory provisions prohibiting the letting of contracts during specified periods near the end of terms of office.  Term contracts for a period exceeding twenty-four (24) months shall also be subject to ratification or cancellation by governing authority boards taking office subsequent to the governing authority board entering the contract. (ii)  Bid proposals and contracts may include price adjustment clauses with relation to the cost to the contractor based upon a nationally published industry-wide or nationally published and recognized cost index.  The cost index used in a price adjustment clause shall be determined by the Department of Finance and Administration for the state agencies and by the governing board for governing authorities.  The bid proposal and contract documents utilizing a price adjustment clause shall contain the basis and method of adjusting unit prices for the change in the cost of such commodities, equipment and public construction. (o)  Purchase law violation prohibition and vendor penalty.  No contract or purchase as herein authorized shall be made for the purpose of circumventing the provisions of this section requiring competitive bids, nor shall it be lawful for any person or concern to submit individual invoices for amounts within those authorized for a contract or purchase where the actual value of the contract or commodity purchased exceeds the authorized amount and the invoices therefor are split so as to appear to be authorized as purchases for which competitive bids are not required.  Submission of such invoices shall constitute a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or by imprisonment for thirty (30) days in the county jail, or both such fine and imprisonment.  In addition, the claim or claims submitted shall be forfeited. (p)  Electrical utility petroleum-based equipment purchase procedure.  When in response to a proper advertisement therefor, no bid firm as to price is submitted to an electric utility for power transformers, distribution transformers, power breakers, reclosers or other articles containing a petroleum product, the electric utility may accept the lowest and best bid therefor although the price is not firm. (q)  Fuel management system bidding procedure.  Any governing authority or agency of the state shall, before contracting for the services and products of a fuel management or fuel access system, enter into negotiations with not fewer than two (2) sellers of fuel management or fuel access systems for competitive written bids to provide the services and products for the systems.  In the event that the governing authority or agency cannot locate two (2) sellers of such systems or cannot obtain bids from two (2) sellers of such systems, it shall show proof that it made a diligent, good-faith effort to locate and negotiate with two (2) sellers of such systems.  Such proof shall include, but not be limited to, publications of a request for proposals and letters soliciting negotiations and bids.  For purposes of this paragraph (q), a fuel management or fuel access system is an automated system of acquiring fuel for vehicles as well as management reports detailing fuel use by vehicles and drivers, and the term "competitive written bid" shall have the meaning as defined in paragraph (b) of this section.  Governing authorities and agencies shall be exempt from this process when contracting for the services and products of fuel management or fuel access systems under the terms of a state contract established by the Office of Purchasing and Travel. (r)  Solid waste contract proposal procedure.  Before entering into any contract for garbage collection or disposal, contract for solid waste collection or disposal or contract for sewage collection or disposal, which involves an expenditure of more than Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00), a governing authority or agency shall issue publicly a request for proposals concerning the specifications for such services which shall be advertised for in the same manner as provided in this section for seeking bids for purchases which involve an expenditure of more than the amount provided in paragraph (c) of this section.  Any request for proposals when issued shall contain terms and conditions relating to price, financial responsibility, technology, legal responsibilities and other relevant factors as are determined by the governing authority or agency to be appropriate for inclusion; all factors determined relevant by the governing authority or agency or required by this paragraph (r) shall be duly included in the advertisement to elicit proposals.  After responses to the request for proposals have been duly received, the governing authority or agency shall select the most qualified proposal or proposals on the basis of price, technology and other relevant factors and from such proposals, but not limited to the terms thereof, negotiate and enter into contracts with one or more of the persons or firms submitting proposals.  If the governing authority or agency deems none of the proposals to be qualified or otherwise acceptable, the request for proposals process may be reinitiated. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this paragraph, where a county with at least thirty-five thousand (35,000) nor more than forty thousand (40,000) population, according to the 1990 federal decennial census, owns or operates a solid waste landfill, the governing authorities of any other county or municipality may contract with the governing authorities of the county owning or operating the landfill, pursuant to a resolution duly adopted and spread upon the minutes of each governing authority involved, for garbage or solid waste collection or disposal services through contract negotiations. (s)  Minority set-aside authorization.  Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, any agency or governing authority, by order placed on its minutes, may, in its discretion, set aside not more than twenty percent (20%) of its anticipated annual expenditures for the purchase of commodities from minority businesses; however, all such set-aside purchases shall comply with all purchasing regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and Administration and shall be subject to bid requirements under this section. Set-aside purchases for which competitive bids are required shall be made from the lowest and best minority business bidder.  For the purposes of this paragraph, the term "minority business" means a business which is owned by a majority of persons who are United States citizens or permanent resident aliens (as defined by the Immigration and Naturalization Service) of the United States, and who are Asian, Black, Hispanic or Native American, according to the following definitions: (i) "Asian" means persons having origins in any of the original people of the Far East, Southeast Asia, the Indian subcontinent, or the Pacific Islands. (ii) "Black" means persons having origins in any black racial group of Africa. (iii) "Hispanic" means persons of Spanish or Portuguese culture with origins in Mexico, South or Central America, or the Caribbean Islands, regardless of race. (iv)  "Native American" means persons having origins in any of the original people of North America, including American Indians, Eskimos and Aleuts. (t)  Construction punch list restriction.  The architect, engineer or other representative designated by the agency or governing authority that is contracting for public construction or renovation may prepare and submit to the contractor only one (1) preliminary punch list of items that do not meet the contract requirements at the time of substantial completion and one (1) final list immediately before final completion and final payment. (u)  Procurement of construction services by state institutions of higher learning.  Contracts for privately financed construction of auxiliary facilities on the campus of a state institution of higher learning may be awarded by the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning to the lowest and best bidder, where sealed bids are solicited, or to the offeror whose proposal is determined to represent the best value to the citizens of the State of Mississippi, where requests for proposals are solicited. (v)  Insurability of bidders for public construction or other public contracts.  In any solicitation for bids to perform public construction or other public contracts to which this section applies, including, but not limited to, contracts for repair and maintenance, for which the contract will require insurance coverage in an amount of not less than One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00), bidders shall be permitted to either submit proof of current insurance coverage in the specified amount or demonstrate ability to obtain the required coverage amount of insurance if the contract is awarded to the bidder.  Proof of insurance coverage shall be submitted within five (5) business days from bid acceptance. (w)  Purchase authorization clarification.  Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing any purchase not authorized by law. (x)  Mississippi Regional Pre-Need Disaster Clean Up Act.  (i)   The Department of Finance and Administration shall develop and implement a process that creates a preferred vendor list for both disaster debris removal and monitoring. (ii)  Any board of supervisors of any county or any governing authority of any municipality may opt in to the benefits and services provided under the appropriate and relevant contract established in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph at the time of a disaster event in that county or municipality.  At the time of opt in, the county or municipality shall assume responsibility for payment in full to the contractor for the disaster-related solid waste collection, disposal or monitoring services provided.  Nothing in this subparagraph (ii) shall be construed as requiring a county or municipality to opt in to any such contract established in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph. SECTION 64.  Section 37-101-413, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-101-413.  (1)  As used in this section, the term "state institutions of higher learning" means those institutions identified in Section 37-101-1 and the University Research Center. (2)  The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning may establish an equipment leasing and purchase program for the use of the state institutions of higher learning.  In establishing and administering the program, the board may perform the following actions: (a)  Adopt policies and procedures to implement the program; (b)  Establish offices or subordinate units as may be necessary for the administration of the program; (c)  Adopt rules and regulations pertaining to the program; (d)  Acquire by purchase, lease or lease-purchase contract and retain or transfer ownership or possession of instructional and other equipment; (e)  Contract for the leasing of such properties and for the financing of leases and purchases; (f)  Enter into contracts with others to provide any services deemed necessary and advisable by the board; (g)  Make purchases and enter into leases according to the requirements of the state public purchasing laws and the requirements of those laws establishing the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services; (h)  Enter into lease financing agreements in connection with purchases made under the authority of this section; (i)  Require the transfer of appropriations of general funds or self-generated funds from the state institutions to those funds that the board may determine are required in connection with any lease financing agreements; (j)  Develop administrative methods for determining age, useful life, replacement value, current use, condition and other characteristics of instructional and research equipment at the state institutions and research facilities; (k)  Determine obsolescence of the equipment and establish priorities for replacement or provision of the equipment or its transfer to another state institution that can continue to utilize it; and (l)  Develop long-range plans for the orderly and systematic acquisition and utilization of the instructional and research equipment in order to eliminate waste and duplication, provide the maximum efficiency of use for expenditures, and achieve equitable allocations of equipment funds to the state institutions consistent with the roles of the institutions and disciplines served. (3)  All institutions of higher learning desiring to purchase, lease or lease-purchase equipment involving an expenditure or expenditures of more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) must procure that equipment under the equipment leasing and purchase program unless funds for the procurement of the equipment under the program are unavailable or the equipment can be procured elsewhere at an overall cost lower than that for which the equipment can be procured under the program. SECTION 65.  Section 37-154-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-154-1.  (1)  To improve quality of life, education and employment opportunities for all citizens, the appropriate agencies of the State of Mississippi listed in subsection (2) of this section shall develop and maintain a State Longitudinal Data System (SLDS).  The system will allow stakeholders and policymakers access data on state residents from birth to the workforce to drive accountability and investment decisions.  The system will include data from multiple state agencies and entities.  The system will provide decision makers a tool to develop policies to support objectives, including, but not limited to: (a)  Enabling Mississippians to secure and retain employment and receive better pay after completing training or postsecondary degrees; (b)  Enabling Mississippi to meet the education and job skill demands of business and industry; (c)  Developing an early warning system, which allows the state to intervene early, improving the graduation rates in high school and college; (d)  Identifying teachers, teaching methods and programs that lead to positive student outcomes; and (e)  Encouraging the sharing of electronic data across educational and other entities. (2)  Individual state agencies and state entities will send data from their internal system to the Statewide Longitudinal Data System.  These initial agencies and entities shall provide data to the SLDS under the provisions developed by the SLDS Governing Board established in Section 37-154-3: (a)  Mississippi Department of Education (MDE); (b)  Mississippi Community College Board; (c)  Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning (IHL); (d)  State Workforce Investment Board (SWIB); (e)  Mississippi Department of Employment Security (MDES); (f)  Mississippi Department of Human Services (MDHS); and (g)  State Early Childhood Advisory Council (SECAC). Any agencies or entities added to SLDS shall provide a representative to the SLDS Governing Board and be governed in the same manner as the initial agencies and entities. (3)  The system will be based on an existing system currently housed, developed and maintained by the National Strategic Planning and Analysis Research Center (nSPARC) at Mississippi State University.  The initial agencies participating in the SLDS Governing Board and nSPARC have worked collaboratively to secure funding through the United States Department of Education to expand and enhance the capacity of the state's existing technology infrastructure for the purposes of developing the SLDS.  The State Data Center, operated by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services (ITS), will provide application hosting services for the SLDS until such time the SLDS Governing Board approves that another entity should perform these services. SECTION 66.  Section 41-143-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-143-1.  (1)  For the purpose of this section, the term "agencies" means the Mississippi State Department of Health, the Mississippi Department of Human Services, the Mississippi Department of Mental Health, the Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services, the Mississippi Office of Workforce Development, the Mississippi Department of Employment Security and the Mississippi Division of Medicaid, and the term "agency" means any one (1) of those entities. (2)  The Department of Information Technology Services (ITS) shall develop, implement and manage a separate website and a mobile application (app) that coordinate and promote information and services related to pregnancy, childbirth and care for dependent children for expectant mothers and new parents.  The website and mobile app shall include, but shall not be limited to, comprehensive information and resources related to adoption assistance, child care, domestic abuse protection, early intervention, food, clothing and supplies related to pregnancy and newborn care, job training and placement, unemployment benefits, paternity, parenting skills, mental health, and prenatal and postpartum care provided by the State of Mississippi or any other governmental entity, or relevant nonprofit organizations, including religious institutions. (3)  The Attorney General shall have the ultimate authority for oversight of the administration of this section and shall coordinate the activities of the agencies and the Department of Information Technology Services under the provisions of this section in order to best effectuate the purpose and intent of this section. (4)  (a)  The information about the services and resources that will be included on the website and mobile app shall be provided to the Attorney General by the agencies about the particular programs and services of the agency that are related to the purpose of the website and mobile app. (b)  The Attorney General, the agencies and each county health department shall provide a prominent link on their own websites to the website and mobile app authorized by this section. (5)  The agencies shall cooperate with ITS, as overseen by the Attorney General, in developing, implementing and managing the website and mobile app.  The website shall be operational not later than October 1, 2023, and the mobile app shall be operational not later than January 1, 2024. (6)  ITS and the agencies, in consultation with the Attorney General, shall apply for any federal grants that may be available to assist in paying the costs of developing, implementing and managing the website and mobile app. (7)  The Attorney General shall promulgate such rules as necessary to implement this section. (8)  Not later than October 1, 2024, the Attorney General shall report to the Chairs of the Senate Judiciary, Division A, and the House Judiciary A Committees, and the Senate Public Health and Welfare Committee and the House Public Health and Human Services Committee on the operation and status of the website and mobile app. SECTION 67.  Section 43-1-28, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-1-28.  (1)  The Department of Human Services shall develop an on-line electronic benefit transfer (EBT) system for the food stamp program in Mississippi as an alternative to issuing food stamp coupons.  The EBT system developed by the department under this section shall (a) provide that food stamp benefits are stored in and issued from a central computer data base and are electronically accessed by households at the point of sale through the use of reusable magnetic-stripe plastic cards; and (b) meet all requirements and standards specified in 7 USCS Section 2016(h) and the rules and regulations issued under that provision for approval by the Secretary of the United States Department of Agriculture. (2)  The department shall develop the EBT system and shall submit an application to the Secretary of the United States Department of Agriculture for approval of the system.  After the EBT system has been approved, the department shall implement and operate the system as a pilot project in a county selected by the department.  After the pilot project has been evaluated and approved by the United States Department of Agriculture, and subject to the availability of funds specifically appropriated therefor, the system may be expanded statewide at a rate determined by the Executive Director of the Department of Human Services.  The system shall be expanded and implemented statewide not later than October 1, 2002. (3)  The department shall seek to obtain the maximum amount of federal financial participation available to fund the cost of administering the EBT system. (4)  The Department of Human Services may develop an on-line electronic benefit transfer (EBT) system for the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) program in Mississippi as an alternative to issuing cash or voucher payments.  The EBT system developed by the department under this section shall (a) provide that TANF benefits are stored in and issued from a central computer data base and are electronically accessed; and (b) meet all requirements and standards specified in the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-193), and the rules and regulations issued under that act.  The department shall seek to obtain the maximum amount of federal financial participation available to fund the cost of administering the EBT system for TANF payments. (5)  In order to facilitate the acquisition and deployment of EBT products and services in Mississippi, the Department of Human Services (DHS) and the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services (MDITS), at their discretion, may utilize EBT agreements from other states and/or multistate coalition agreements that allow other states to acquire EBT products and services.  After going through the approved ITS bidding process and the state is unable to acquire an EBT contract, DHS and ITS may negotiate an EBT contract with any vendor who meets DHS and ITS, EBT requirements. SECTION 68.  Section 45-27-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 45-27-7.  (1)  The Mississippi Justice Information Center shall: (a)  Develop, operate and maintain an information system which will support the collection, storage, retrieval and dissemination of all data described in this chapter, consistent with those principles of scope, security and responsiveness prescribed by this chapter. (b)  Cooperate with all criminal justice agencies within the state in providing those forms, procedures, standards and related training assistance necessary for the uniform operation of the statewide center. (c)  Offer assistance and, when practicable, instruction to all local law enforcement agencies in establishing efficient local records systems. (d)  Make available, upon request, to all local and state criminal justice agencies, to all federal criminal justice agencies and to criminal justice agencies in other states any information in the files of the center which will aid such agencies in the performance of their official duties.  For this purpose the center shall operate on a twenty-four-hour basis, seven (7) days a week.  Such information, when authorized by the director of the center, may also be made available to any other agency of this state or any political subdivision thereof and to any federal agency, upon assurance by the agency concerned that the information is to be used for official purposes only in the prevention or detection of crime or the apprehension of criminal offenders. (e)  Cooperate with other agencies of this state, the crime information agencies of other states, and the national crime information center systems of the Federal Bureau of Investigation in developing and conducting an interstate, national and international system of criminal identification and records. (f)  Make available, upon request, to nongovernmental entities or employers certain information for noncriminal justice purposes as specified in Section 45-27-12. (g)  Institute necessary measures in the design, implementation and continued operation of the justice information system to ensure the privacy and security of the system. Such measures shall include establishing complete control over use of and access to the system and restricting its integral resources and facilities and those either possessed or procured and controlled by criminal justice agencies.  Such security measures must meet standards developed by the center as well as those set by the nationally operated systems for interstate sharing of information. (h)  Provide data processing for files listing motor vehicle drivers' license numbers, motor vehicle registration numbers, wanted and stolen motor vehicles, outstanding warrants, identifiable stolen property and such other files as may be of general assistance to law enforcement agencies; provided, however, that the purchase, lease, rental or acquisition in any manner of "computer equipment or services," as defined in Section 25-53-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be subject to the approval of the Mississippi Information Technology Services. (i)  Maintain a field coordination and support unit which shall have all the power conferred by law upon any peace officer of this state. (2)  The department, including the investigative division or the center, may: (a)  Obtain and store fingerprints, descriptions, photographs and any other pertinent identifying data from crime scenes and on persons who: (i)  Have been or are hereafter arrested or taken into custody in this state: 1.  For an offense which is a felony; 2.  For an offense which is a misdemeanor; 3.  As a fugitive from justice; or (ii)  Are or become habitual offenders; or (iii)  Are currently or become confined to any prison, penitentiary or other penal institution; or (iv)  Are unidentified human corpses found in the state; or (v)  Have submitted fingerprints for conducting criminal history record checks. (b)  Compare all fingerprint and other identifying data received with that already on file and determine whether or not a criminal record is found for such person, and at once inform the requesting agency or arresting officer of those facts that may be disseminated consistent with applicable security and privacy laws and regulations.  A record shall be maintained for a minimum of one (1) year of the dissemination of each individual criminal history, including at least the date and recipient of such information. (c)  Establish procedures to respond to those individuals who file requests to review their own records, pursuant to Sections 45-27-11 and 45-27-12, and to cooperate in the correction of the central center records and those of contributing agencies when their accuracy has been successfully challenged either through the related contributing agencies or by court order issued on behalf of an individual. (d)  Retain in the system the fingerprints of all law enforcement officers and part-time law enforcement officers, as those terms are defined in Section 45-6-3, any fingerprints sent by the Mississippi State Department of Health, and of all applicants to law enforcement agencies. (3)  There shall be a presumption that a copy of any document submitted to the center in accordance with the provisions of Section 45-27-9 that has been processed as set forth in this chapter and subsequently certified and provided by the center to a law enforcement agency or a court shall be admissible in any proceeding without further authentication unless a person objecting to that admissibility has successfully challenged the document under the provisions of Section 45-27-11. SECTION 69.  Section 49-37-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-37-7.  (1)  There is created the Mississippi Statewide Scientific Information Management System Coordinating Council, hereinafter referred to as "coordinating council," for the purpose of developing a strategic plan for a statewide scientific information management system and serving as a coordinating entity for all aspects of scientific information management. (2)  (a)  The council shall consist of the following voting members:  the Executive Director of the Department of Environmental Quality; the Executive Director of the Department of Economic and Community Development; the Executive Director of the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks; the Executive Director of the Department of Marine Resources; the State Health Officer; the State Forester; the Executive Director of the Department of Transportation; the Chairman of the Mississippi Water Resources Advisory Council; the Vice-President for Research and Sponsored Programs at each university on the Mississippi Research Consortium; the Vice-President for Agriculture, Forestry and Veterinary Medicine at Mississippi State University; the State Director of Technology Transfer; the Center Director of the National Aeronautics and Space Administration, Stennis Space Center; the District Chief, Mississippi District, United States Geological Survey; the Executive Director of the Mississippi Automated Resource Information System; the Executive Director of the Department of Information Technology Services; the President of the Institute of Technology Development; and two (2) representatives of the private sector user community appointed by the Governor. Members of the coordinating council not appointed by the Governor shall serve a term concurrent with their term of office in their respective position.  Nonappointed members may designate an alternate to serve in their stead and the alternate shall have the authority to act for the designating member. Members of the council appointed by the Governor shall serve four-year terms. (b)  In addition to the members of the coordinating council specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the coordinating council may invite, as participating members, representatives of any other state and federal organizations, or individuals possessing appropriate expertise or who have a viable interest in the development and implementation of the statewide scientific information management system. (c)  The Chairman of the Senate Environmental Protection, Conservation and Water Resources Committee and one (1) member of that committee appointed by the chairman may attend meetings of the coordinating council.  The Speaker of the House of Representatives may designate the Chairman of the House Conservation and Water Resources Committee and one (1) member of that committee to attend any meeting of the coordinating council.  The appointing authorities may designate alternate members from their respective houses to serve when the regular designees are unable to attend such meetings of the coordinating council.  The legislative designees shall have no jurisdiction or vote on any matter within the jurisdiction of the coordinating council.  For attending meetings of the coordinating council, the legislators shall receive per diem and expenses which shall be paid from the contingent expense funds of their respective houses in the same amounts as provided for committee meetings when the Legislature is not in session; however, no per diem and expenses for attending meetings of the coordinating council will be paid while the Legislature is in session.  No per diem and expenses will be paid except for attending meetings of the coordinating council without prior approval of the proper committee in their respective houses. (d)  Original appointments to the coordinating council shall be made no later than October 1, 1999.  The Governor shall require adequate disclosure of potential conflicts of interest by appointed members of the coordinating council.  Vacancies on the coordinating council shall be filled by appointment in the same manner as the original appointments. (e)  The coordinating council shall elect from its membership a chairperson to preside over meetings and vice-chairperson to preside in the absence of the chairperson or when the chairperson shall be excused.  The coordinating council shall adopt procedures governing the manner of conducting its business.  A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum to do business. (f)  Members of the coordinating council shall serve without compensation, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection.  At the direction of the chairman of the coordinating council and contingent upon the availability of sufficient funds, each member may receive reimbursement for reasonable expenses, including travel expenses in accordance with rates established pursuant to Section 25-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972, incurred in attending meetings of the coordinating council. (3)  The coordinating council shall convene before November 15, 1999. (4)  The coordinating council shall not employ any permanent staff, rent or occupy independent office space or otherwise establish a full-time office. (5)  In conducting its activities under this chapter, the coordinating council may elicit the support of and participation by any state or local governmental agency as may be necessary or appropriate.  All state and local governmental agencies shall provide support or participation as requested. (6)  The coordinating council may exercise those duties and powers necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including, but not limited to, the following functions: (a)  Conduct, or cause to be conducted any studies, analyses or evaluations related to the development and implementation of a scientific information management system; (b)  Apply and contract for and accept any grants, public or private funds, gifts or proceeds in furtherance of the activities of the coordinating council; (c)  Authorize the Executive Director of the Department of Environmental Quality to enter into all contracts or execute all instruments, on behalf of the coordinating council, and do all acts necessary, desirable or convenient to carry out any power expressly granted to the council in this chapter; and (d)  Expend or distribute any funds or assets in its custody or under its control appropriate in carrying out the purposes of this chapter. SECTION 70.  Section 57-13-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 57-13-23.  (1)  There is created and established the Mississippi Automated Resource Information System (MARIS), (heretofore created by Executive Order No. 459, dated May 26, 1983, as amended by Executive Order No. 562, dated January 15, 1986), which shall be the mechanism within state government for the storing, processing, extracting and disseminating of useful data and information relating to the state's resources. (2)  The goal of MARIS shall be to facilitate the achievement of state agencies' responsibilities as they relate to the development, management, conservation, protection and utilization of the resources of Mississippi by making usable resource data and information more readily available and in a format that is consistent throughout state departments, agencies and institutions, and, to the extent possible, with federal and privately generated resource data banks. (3)  MARIS shall be under the supervision and general policy formulations of a policy committee as the cooperative effort of state departments, agencies and institutions for the sharing of useful data acquired and generated by state agencies in discharging their individual responsibilities. (4)  There is created and established the MARIS Policy Committee composed of the directors or their designees of the following departments, agencies and institutions: Center for Population Studies, University of Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services Department of Agriculture and Commerce Department of Archives and History Mississippi Development Authority Department of Human Services Department of Child Protection Services Department of Environmental Quality Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks Mississippi Department of Transportation Mississippi Emergency Management Agency Mississippi Mineral Resources Institute, University of Mississippi Department of Finance and Administration Office of the Secretary of State Public Service Commission Remote Sensing Center, Mississippi State University State Forestry Commission State Department of Health State Oil and Gas Board State Soil and Water Conservation Commission Department of Revenue University Research Center Water Management Council. (5)  The MARIS Policy Committee shall elect a chairman, vice chairman and secretary, and it shall elect an executive committee from the membership of the policy committee to be composed of not less than five (5) nor more than nine (9) members, including the aforesaid officers.  The policy committee may elect to the executive committee one (1) person other than from its membership.  The policy committee shall determine the authority and responsibility to be exercised by the executive committee. (6)  There is created and established the MARIS Task Force which shall be composed of at least one (1) representative from each of the aforesaid agencies with knowledge in computer applications to natural, cultural, industrial or economic resources to be appointed by the respective directors thereof, and any other persons deemed advisable by the policy committee. (7)  The University Research Center shall house the MARIS equipment and staff and shall provide administrative support for the policy committee and technical support to all member agencies. (8)  It shall be the duty of every department, agency, office and institution of the State of Mississippi, and the officers thereof, to cooperate with and assist the MARIS Policy Committee in every reasonable way. SECTION 71.  Section 63-9-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 63-9-31.  (1)  In addition to any other monetary penalties and other penalties imposed by law, any county, municipality or the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District Patrol which participates in a wireless radio communications program approved by the applicable governing authorities may assess an additional surcharge in an amount not to exceed Ten Dollars ($10.00) on each person upon whom a court imposes a fine or other penalty for each violation of Title 63, Mississippi Code of 1972, except offenses relating to vehicular parking or registration. On all citations issued by Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol officers, a surcharge in the amount of Ten Dollars ($10.00) shall be collected by the court and deposited as provided in subsection (2) of this section.  The proceeds from the surcharge on citations issued by county and municipal law enforcement officers or the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District Patrol may be used by a county or municipality only to fund that county's or municipality's or the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District Patrol's participation in the wireless radio communications program by funding public safety wireless communications systems and related computer and communications equipment.  The proceeds from the surcharge on citations issued by Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol officers shall be used as provided in subsection (2) of this section.  All proceeds from the surcharge imposed by this subsection shall be deposited into a special fund in the Department of Public Safety's Office of Public Safety Planning. The Office of Public Safety Planning shall promulgate rules and procedures relating to the administration of the special fund and the disbursement of monies in the fund to participating governmental entities.  The maximum amount that a governmental entity may receive from the special fund shall be an amount equal to the deposits made into the fund by that entity, less one percent (1%) to be retained by the Office of Public Safety Planning to defray the costs of administering the special fund.  Interest earned on the special fund shall remain in the fund and shall be used by the Office of Public Safety Planning to further defray the costs of administering the special fund. (2)  Deposits into the special fund resulting from citations issued by the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol shall be utilized as follows:  Fifty percent (50%) of the deposits into the special fund shall be used to automate the citations issued by Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol officers (including the transmittal of citations to the justice court, retrieval of the disposition from the justice court, and updating the driver's records) and fifty percent (50%) of the deposits into the special fund shall be used for the purpose of funding wireless communications and related computer equipment and computer software, subject to the approval of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services. (3)  Approval of a wireless radio communications program must be given by the applicable governing authorities when: (a)  The program includes the sharing of support facilities including, but not limited to, towers, shelters and microwave by participating entities; or (b)  The program includes the establishment of a mutual aid system using common radio frequency channels between participating entities; or (c)  The program sets forth a feasible methodology that utilizes the radio frequency spectrum in an efficient manner. (4)  Participating counties, municipalities, the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District Patrol and the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol must provide notification of facilities available for interoperability to the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services annually. (5)  Counties and municipalities and the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District Patrol participating in a wireless radio communications program and the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol must comply with competitive bidding requirements prescribed in Section 31-7-13 and are encouraged to utilize an open architecture, nonproprietary system. (6)  From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law. (7)  From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section. SECTION 72.  Section 63-21-18, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 63-21-18.  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall provide equipment for the operation and maintenance of the automated statewide motor vehicle, manufactured housing and mobile home registration system by the department. The automated statewide motor vehicle, manufactured housing and mobile home registration system shall provide for computer terminals and printers, as authorized by the Department of Information Technology Services, to be located in the quantity necessary in each county seat tax collector's office and any other office in which more than fifty percent (50%) of the motor vehicle registrations in the county are made. All county tax collectors shall participate in such system as it applies to Chapter 19, Title 27; Chapter 51, Title 27; Chapter 21, Title 63; Mississippi Code of 1972, in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the department.  Such rules and regulations shall provide that counties which have an existing computer system designed to produce registration data may elect to use such existing system to communicate title/registration data to the department through the computer furnished by the state as hereinabove provided in this section.  If the department finds and determines that a county has failed to successfully establish or update title/registration data into the statewide vehicle, manufactured housing and mobile home title/registration system, either through use of equipment supplied by the department or through the interfacing between the network system and county computer equipment, the department shall thereafter cause to be withheld the county's homestead exemption reimbursement monies, except for school districts and municipalities, until such time as the county has complied with this provision.  Such monies as are withheld from a county for failure to comply with this provision shall be placed into a special escrow account to be established in the State Treasury.  Once the county achieves compliance by successfully establishing or updating title/registration data into the statewide vehicle, manufactured housing and mobile home title/registration system, then the department shall cause to be released to the county all funds held in escrow on the county's behalf during the period of noncompliance.  All interest earned shall accrue to the benefit of the county on any funds placed in an escrow account.  Any cost involved in interfacing between existing county computer systems and the state-provided computer shall be paid by the county. The computer terminals and printers placed in each county tax collector's office may be utilized to provide additional computer functions as authorized by the Department of Information Technology Services. The State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants to the State Treasurer for the expenditures for the implementation and maintenance of the system upon requisitions signed by the Commissioner of Revenue, as authorized by the Legislature. It is the intent of the Legislature that the operation of the statewide motor vehicle, manufactured housing and mobile home title registration system shall be the responsibility of the department. The department shall provide for the transfer of motor vehicle, manufactured housing and mobile home title and lien registration information to the department by electronic means from banks and other lending institutions as provided in Section 63-21-18.  The Department of Information Technology Services shall cooperate with the department in implementing the provisions of Section 63-21-18, and shall provide the department with whatever assistance the department needs to carry out the provisions of Section 63-21-18. A used motor vehicle parts dealer or scrap metal processor must utilize the department's automated statewide motor vehicle registration system for the purpose of complying with the requirements of Section 63-21-39(1)(a). SECTION 73.  Section 73-34-8, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 73-34-8.  (1)  Effective July 1, 2023, the Mississippi Real Estate Appraiser Licensing and Certification Board shall be separated from the Mississippi Real Estate Commission ("commission") and shall thereafter operate as an independent board to be known as the Mississippi Real Estate Appraisal Board ("board"). (2)  The Mississippi Real Estate Commission and the Mississippi Real Estate Appraisal Board shall cooperate on the orderly transfer of functions and resources as provided under this chapter to ensure that by July 1, 2023, the Mississippi Real Estate Appraisal Board shall be fully functional and independent from the Real Estate Commission. (3)  The Mississippi Real Estate Commission and the Mississippi Real Estate Appraisal Board shall comply with the provisions of Section 5-11-1 et seq., regarding the transfer of agency functions. (4)  (a)  The Mississippi State Personnel Board shall provide assistance to the commission and the board to ensure that all authorized positions of the Mississippi Real Estate Appraiser Licensing and Certification Board are identified and properly assigned to the Mississippi Real Estate Appraisal Board by July 1, 2023. (b)  The Department of Finance and Administration shall assist the Mississippi Real Estate Appraisal Board in identifying office space appropriate to meet its needs in a state-owned office building if possible, and shall further provide any temporary accounting or other assistance to the board to assist the board in becoming operational and independent. (c)  The Department of Information Technology Services shall provide assistance to the Mississippi Real Estate Appraisal Board to ensure that any and all computer systems, web pages and other information technology communications systems are operational by July 1, 2023. (d)  Beginning on July 1, 2023, wherever the terms "Mississippi Real Estate Appraiser Licensing and Certification Board" or "board," when referring to the Mississippi Real Estate Appraiser Licensing and Certification Board, appear in any law, rule, regulation or document the same shall be construed to mean the Mississippi Real Estate Appraisal Board. SECTION 74.  Section 75-12-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 75-12-33.  The executive authority of each governmental agency of this state shall determine whether, and the extent to which, it will create and retain electronic records and convert written records to electronic records subject to applicable policies and standards of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services and the Mississippi Department of Archives and History as may be adopted pursuant to law. SECTION 75.  Section 89-5-109, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 89-5-109.  ADMINISTRATION AND STANDARDS. (a)  The Mississippi Electronic Recording Commission consisting of eleven (11) members is created to adopt standards to implement this article.  The membership of the commission shall comprise the following: (1)  A person appointed by the Governor; (2)  A person appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (3)  A person appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; (4)  Three (3) members of the Chancery Clerks' Association; (5)  A person appointed by the Mississippi Association of Supervisors; (6)  The Director of the Mississippi Information Technology Services or his designee; and (7)  Three (3) persons appointed by the Secretary of State. Appointed members of the commission shall serve a term of two (2) years from the date of appointment as evidenced by letters to the Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Representatives, with the appointment letter last received being the effective date of appointment.  Any member serving by virtue of appointment shall serve until a successor is duly appointed. Appointed members shall be eligible for reappointment at the end of their terms. (b)  Appointments are to be made no later than October 1, 2011, and the initial meeting of the commission is to be held no later than November 1, 2011.  The initial meeting is to be called at a time and place designated by the Secretary of State who shall preside until a permanent chair is elected.  The election of a permanent chair shall be held at the initial meeting.  The chair shall serve during the chair's tenure but shall not serve consecutive terms as chair.  The commission shall establish rules to govern the conduct of its meetings and shall elect such officers as provided in the rules.  A quorum shall consist of no fewer than six (6) members. (c)  To keep the standards and practices of chancery clerks in this state in harmony with the standards and practices of recording offices in other jurisdictions that enact substantially this article and to keep the technology used by chancery clerks in this state compatible with technology used by recording offices in other jurisdictions that enact substantially this article, the commission, so far as is consistent with the purposes, policies, and provisions of this article, in adopting, amending, and repealing standards shall consider: (1)  Standards and practices of other jurisdictions; (2)  The most recent standards promulgated by national standard-setting bodies, such as the Property Records Industry Association; (3)  The views of interested persons and governmental officials and entities; (4)  The needs of counties of varying size, population, and resources; and (5)  Standards requiring adequate information security protection to ensure that electronic documents are accurate, authentic, adequately preserved, and resistant to tampering. SECTION 76.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.